Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls) History

Founding and Early Years (2005 2010)
Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling was established in 2005 by Meiko Satomura, a renowned professional wrestler with roots in GAEA Japan. The promotion was based in Sendai, Japan, with a focus on promoting women's wrestling and developing new talent. It quickly became known for its hard hitting style, emphasizing technical and strong style wrestling, diverging from the idol based presentations seen in other promotions. The inaugural event was held on July 9, 2006, with Satomura leading as both the in ring talent and the promotion’s guiding force. Early on, the roster primarily consisted of rookies trained by Satomura, supplemented by guest appearances from wrestlers across other promotions.

Building a Roster and Partnerships (2011 2015)
During this period, Sendai Girls gained prominence by cultivating homegrown talent like Dash Chisako, Sendai Sachiko, and Miyako Morino. The promotion also established collaborative relationships with other organizations such as Ice Ribbon, JWP, and Stardom, enabling talent exchanges that diversified their shows and increased visibility. They began holding events outside of Sendai, gradually expanding their reach across Japan. The promotion was known for hosting annual tournaments, such as the "Dantai Taikou," which featured inter promotional competitions.

Rise to Prominence and International Expansion (2016 2019)
With Meiko Satomura's reputation growing internationally, Sendai Girls started expanding its presence outside Japan. Satomura’s participation in WWE’s Mae Young Classic in 2018 further brought attention to the promotion. Sendai Girls held shows in the UK, partnering with promotions like Fight Club: PRO, introducing their talent to new audiences. Key figures like Chihiro Hashimoto emerged as central stars, exemplifying the promotion’s blend of power and technical wrestling. During this time, Sendai Girls solidified itself as a promotion that balanced developing young talent while maintaining a core group of veteran wrestlers, such as Satomura herself.

Challenges and Adaptations (2020 Present)
The COVID 19 pandemic posed challenges, as live events were canceled or held without audiences. Despite this, Sendai Girls adapted by hosting smaller events and utilizing online platforms to engage fans. The promotion continued to focus on its developmental roots, bringing in new wrestlers and establishing a new generation of stars like Mika Iwata and Manami. In 2021, with Satomura’s signing to WWE UK as a full time performer, Chihiro Hashimoto became a leading figure, further solidifying her as the ace of the promotion. Sendai Girls maintained its commitment to hard hitting, high quality matches, preserving its unique brand of joshi wrestling.

Current Status
Sendai Girls remains a well regarded promotion in the world of joshi wrestling. With a focus on developing talent and maintaining a high standard of in ring competition, it continues to attract a dedicated fanbase domestically and internationally. The promotion upholds Meiko Satomura’s legacy, emphasizing rigorous training and a no nonsense style, distinguishing itself from other organizations in the scene.

Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls) Historical Roster


      Aasa Maika  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022
    Position on the Card:   Developing talent, lower mid card
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Aasa Maika began her career in Sendai Girls as a developing wrestler, focusing on mastering fundamental wrestling techniques. She often combined basic strikes and grappling, positioning herself as a promising talent in the lower mid card.

      Ai Houzan  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, agile with technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Missile Dropkick, Cross Arm Breaker
    Brief Description:   Ai Houzan is a young, agile wrestler known for her speed and technical ability. Her matches are marked by quick transitions and aerial maneuvers, positioning her as an exciting up and comer in the mid card.

      Aiger  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic act
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, comedic with traditional elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Face Claw, Spooky Rope Walk, Eye Poke
    Brief Description:   Aiger’s character was centered around a spooky, gimmick based persona. Her matches often blended traditional wrestling with humorous antics, providing lighthearted entertainment during her time in Sendai Girls.

      Aizawa NO.  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, freelance competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Striking based, with technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Rolling Elbow, Neckbreaker, Lariat
    Brief Description:   Aizawa NO. made an appearance as a freelance competitor, bringing a mix of striking and technical skills. Known for his hard hitting moves, he participated in matches that highlighted his versatility and toughness.

      Aja Kong  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Main event, legendary powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Uraken (Spinning Backfist), Brainbuster, Diving Elbow Drop
    Brief Description:   Aja Kong's presence in Sendai Girls added star power and credibility. Known for her powerful, hard hitting style, she participated in marquee matches that often featured brutal exchanges, highlighting her dominance and legendary status.

      AKARI  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submission and grappling focus
    Three Signature Moves:   Armbar, German Suplex, Crossface
    Brief Description:   AKARI brought her technical grappling skills to Sendai Girls, focusing on submissions and solid ring control. She participated in competitive mid card matches, showcasing her growing reputation as a skilled junior wrestler.

      Aki Kambayashi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, guest competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with a mix of technical and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Running Knee, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Aki Kambayashi appeared as a guest competitor, engaging in matches that highlighted her traditional wrestling style. She combined technical maneuvers with striking, providing well rounded performances during her stint.

      Aki Shizuku  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2017
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with grappling and submission focus
    Three Signature Moves:   Figure Four Leglock, Arm Drag, Drop Toehold
    Brief Description:   Aki Shizuku’s tenure in Sendai Girls emphasized her technical skills, with a focus on submissions. She was a reliable mid card presence, delivering matches that showcased her ability to control opponents with precision grappling.

      AKINO  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, experienced veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of technical and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex, Cross Arm Breaker
    Brief Description:   AKINO made a guest appearance in Sendai Girls, bringing her experience and strong style to the promotion. Known for her precise strikes and technical acumen, she participated in matches that highlighted her veteran presence and skill.

      Akita Hoshika  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Bulldog, Springboard Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Akita Hoshika is a developing talent who relies on speed and agility. Her matches often focus on quick, evasive maneuvers, allowing her to surprise opponents and showcase her potential in the lower mid card.

      Akito  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Submission based, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Figure Four Leglock, Cross Armbreaker, Rolling Elbow
    Brief Description:   Akito's appearance in Sendai Girls showcased his technical and submission expertise. He participated in matches that highlighted his ability to control opponents with precise holds and targeted strikes, establishing himself as a skilled mid card competitor.

      Alex Lee  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with striking and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Heel Kick, Snap Suplex, Running Clothesline
    Brief Description:   Alex Lee brought her strong, striking heavy style to Sendai Girls, appearing as an international guest. Known for her ability to blend power and speed, she delivered solid performances in the mid card, often engaging in physical, hard hitting bouts.

      ALL OUT  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, intergender team
    Wrestling Style:   Mixed styles, with teamwork and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Tandem Dropkick, Assisted Neckbreaker
    Brief Description:   ALL OUT made a guest appearance as a team, bringing their coordinated, high energy style to Sendai Girls. Their matches emphasized teamwork and fluid exchanges, combining various styles to create engaging bouts that resonated with the audience.

      Allysin Kay  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, international star
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with striking and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Big Boot, Crossface, DDT
    Brief Description:   Allysin Kay's guest appearance showcased her powerful, no nonsense style. Known for her striking and technical prowess, she participated in high profile matches that allowed her to demonstrate her strength and versatility, making an impact in the upper mid card.

      Amazon  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strength and brawling
    Three Signature Moves:   Powerslam, Running Shoulder Block, Chokeslam
    Brief Description:   Amazon's appearance was marked by her imposing presence and power based offense. She engaged in matches that emphasized her strength, often using brawling tactics to dominate her opponents, solidifying her position as a formidable mid carder.

      Ami Miura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with a mix of grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Rear Naked Choke
    Brief Description:   Ami Miura is a developing wrestler who focuses on traditional techniques, using a mix of grappling and strikes. She has been steadily improving in the lower mid card, gaining experience and honing her in ring skills.

      Ami Sato  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Arm Drag, Drop Toehold, Spinning Heel Kick
    Brief Description:   Ami Sato's matches are characterized by her quickness and technical grappling. As an emerging talent in the mid card, she focuses on smooth transitions and effective counters, building a reputation for her agility and in ring intelligence.

      Andras Miyagi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, unique character
    Wrestling Style:   Striking based, with unorthodox elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Backfist, German Suplex, Diving Elbow Drop
    Brief Description:   Andras Miyagi brought a distinctive, unpredictable style to Sendai Girls, combining strong strikes with an unusual, charismatic approach. She was known for her unique persona, making her matches intriguing and engaging for fans.

      Annie Social  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Striking, with traditional wrestling moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Big Boot, Swinging Neckbreaker, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Annie Social’s appearance as an international guest added diversity to the lower mid card. She combined striking with traditional wrestling techniques, providing solid, straightforward matches that highlighted her skills.

      Aoi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, young talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Snapmare, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Aoi is a promising young talent who focuses on speed and agility. Her matches often feature fast paced sequences and smooth grappling, helping her build a foundation in the lower mid card of Sendai Girls.

      Aoi Ishibashi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Armbar, Dropkick, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   Aoi Ishibashi focused on building her technical skills during her time in Sendai Girls. As a developing competitor, she utilized a mix of grappling and strikes, participating in lower card matches that helped her gain experience.

      Arisa Nakajima  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical ace
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on technical grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Missile Dropkick, Cross Arm Breaker
    Brief Description:   Arisa Nakajima's guest appearance showcased her strong technical skills and intense style. Known for her precision and versatility, she delivered competitive matches that highlighted her ability to control the pace and adapt to different opponents.

      ASUKA  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Moonsault, Springboard Dropkick, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   ASUKA brought her dynamic, high flying style to Sendai Girls, known for her agility and athleticism. Her guest appearances were marked by exciting, fast paced matches that showcased her ability to perform aerial maneuvers with precision.

      Asuka Oki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, guest competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with striking and basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   DDT, Snap Suplex, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Asuka Oki's time in Sendai Girls was brief but effective, participating in matches that emphasized traditional wrestling. She combined strikes and basic grappling to deliver straightforward performances in the lower mid card.

      Atsuko Emoto  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2011 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with brawling and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Powerbomb, Boston Crab
    Brief Description:   Atsuko Emoto’s appearances were marked by her strength and power based wrestling. She brought a no nonsense, physical style to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that emphasized her ability to dominate opponents with brawling and grappling.

      Aya Mizunami  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, striking specialist
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, German Suplex, Running Elbow Smash
    Brief Description:   Aya Mizunami was known for her strong style approach, combining striking with grappling to deliver hard hitting matches. Her time in Sendai Girls was marked by competitive bouts that emphasized her toughness and endurance.

      Aya Sakura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Aya Sakura participated in the lower mid card as she worked on developing her wrestling style. Her matches focused on traditional techniques, allowing her to build a foundation and gain experience in the ring.

      Aya Yuuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Dropkick, Crossface
    Brief Description:   Aya Yuuki was a rising competitor who relied on speed and technical prowess. Her matches showcased her ability to execute quick transitions and grappling moves, helping her establish herself as a solid mid card presence.

      Ayako Hamada  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Main event, international star
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with high flying and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Swanton Bomb, Spinning Heel Kick, Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Ayako Hamada brought her international experience and hybrid wrestling style to Sendai Girls, participating in high profile matches. Known for her versatility and ability to blend high flying moves with technical grappling, she delivered standout performances during her guest appearances.

      Ayako Sato  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 2016
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a focus on submissions and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Cross Arm Breaker, Sleeper Hold, Rolling Neckbreaker
    Brief Description:   Ayako Sato’s time in Sendai Girls emphasized her technical grappling skills. She participated in matches that highlighted her ability to control the pace and apply effective submission holds, making her a solid competitor in the mid card.

      Ayame Sasamura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with striking and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Heel Kick, Crossbody, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Ayame Sasamura is known for her speed and agility, often utilizing quick strikes and aerial maneuvers. Her matches in Sendai Girls showcase her fast paced style, making her a dynamic presence in the junior division.

      Ayane Mizumura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Leg Drop
    Brief Description:   Ayane Mizumura’s time in Sendai Girls was focused on developing her fundamental skills. Her matches highlighted basic grappling and strikes, positioning her as a promising lower mid card competitor.

      Ayumi Kurihara  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2012 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical ace
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and submission moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Uranage, German Suplex, Missile Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Ayumi Kurihara was known for her technical prowess and hard hitting style. During her guest appearances, she showcased her ability to mix striking and submissions, delivering intense and competitive matches in the upper mid card.

      Azumi Hyuga  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2011 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran technician
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a mix of grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Underhook Suplex, Spinning Back Kick, Crossface
    Brief Description:   Azumi Hyuga brought her veteran presence and technical style to Sendai Girls, participating in matches that emphasized precise grappling. Her guest appearance allowed fans to witness her skilled and methodical approach to wrestling.

      Beauty Bear  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019 (as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, tag team division
    Wrestling Style:   Mixed styles, with teamwork and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Tandem Clothesline, Assisted Splash
    Brief Description:   Beauty Bear was a tag team known for their cohesive teamwork and mixed wrestling styles. Their matches often showcased a combination of power moves and synchronized attacks, making them a solid team in the mid card tag division.

      Best Friends (Arisa Nakajima & Tsukasa Fujimoto)  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, renowned tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a mix of speed and precision
    Three Signature Moves:   Double German Suplex, Tandem Superkick, Double Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Best Friends, consisting of Arisa Nakajima and Tsukasa Fujimoto, brought their acclaimed tag team dynamics to Sendai Girls. Known for their precision and technical excellence, they engaged in fast paced, well coordinated matches that highlighted their synergy.

      Big Bang Nicole  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strength and brawling
    Three Signature Moves:   Powerbomb, Running Clothesline, Bearhug
    Brief Description:   Big Bang Nicole was recognized for her strength and imposing presence in the ring. Her guest appearance in Sendai Girls featured matches that emphasized her ability to overpower opponents with sheer force, making her a formidable mid card competitor.

      Big THE Ryokan  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic act
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Comedic Arm Drag, Overhead Chop, Rolling Splash
    Brief Description:   Big THE Ryokan was a character driven wrestler whose matches focused on humor and lighthearted entertainment. His gimmick based style provided comic relief, offering a fun contrast to the more intense matches on the card.

      Bob Bob Momo Banana  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, gimmick character
    Wrestling Style:   Comedic, with basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Armbar, Banana Split (Modified Leg Split), Running Elbow Drop
    Brief Description:   Bob Bob Momo Banana was a comedic persona who participated in lower card matches. Her style blended humor with basic wrestling moves, creating a playful and entertaining dynamic during her brief stint in Sendai Girls.

      Bolshoi Kid  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2013 2015
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior division
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and quick grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Crossbody, Dropkick, Tornado DDT
    Brief Description:   Bolshoi Kid was a junior wrestler known for her high flying style and agility. She participated in energetic matches that showcased her quick movements and ability to execute aerial maneuvers, making her a notable presence in the junior division.

      Carlos Amano  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2011 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Submission based, with strong technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Armbar, Guillotine Choke, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Carlos Amano brought her technical and submission focused style to Sendai Girls during her guest appearances. Known for her precise grappling and ability to control the pace of matches, she delivered solid performances in the mid card.

      Cassandra Miyagi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 2020
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, charismatic character
    Wrestling Style:   Brawling, with unorthodox moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Elbow Drop, Running Knee, Spinebuster
    Brief Description:   Cassandra Miyagi was known for her unique persona and brawling style. Her matches often featured unpredictable tactics and striking, which allowed her to stand out as a charismatic and entertaining performer in the upper mid card.

      Cat Power  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Powerbomb, Clothesline, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   Cat Power brought her strength and power based style to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that emphasized her ability to dominate opponents. Her appearances highlighted her aggressive approach, making her a solid mid card competitor.

      Charli Evans  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2020
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Charli Evans made an impact in Sendai Girls with her hard hitting, strong style approach. Known for her striking ability and technical grappling, she delivered competitive matches that showcased her adaptability and toughness.

      Cherry  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 2016 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a focus on submissions and traditional moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Sleeper Hold, Snapmare
    Brief Description:   Cherry's time in Sendai Girls was marked by her technical expertise and veteran presence. Her matches emphasized solid grappling and submissions, making her a reliable and consistent performer in the mid card.

      Chi Chi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Running Elbow
    Brief Description:   Chi Chi's brief appearance showcased her developing skills, with a focus on traditional wrestling techniques. She participated in lower mid card matches, working to refine her moves and gain experience.

      Chie Ozora  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with high flying and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Missile Dropkick, Springboard Moonsault, Hurricanrana
    Brief Description:   Chie Ozora is known for her agility and high flying style, often relying on speed to outmaneuver her opponents. Her matches are characterized by quick transitions and aerial maneuvers, establishing her as a dynamic junior competitor.

      Chihiro Hashimoto  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 Present
    Position on the Card:   Main event, powerhouse ace
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strong grappling and suplexes
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Lariat, Deadlift Gutwrench Suplex
    Brief Description:   Chihiro Hashimoto is the ace of Sendai Girls, known for her strength and dominant in ring style. With a background in amateur wrestling, she has become a formidable force, delivering high impact matches that showcase her power and technical skill, making her a consistent main eventer.

      Chihiro Oikawa  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Chihiro Oikawa's appearances in Sendai Girls focused on building her traditional wrestling techniques. Her matches were straightforward, emphasizing basic grappling and strikes as she worked to develop her in ring persona.

      Chikayo Nagashima  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 2012 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, experienced competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Foot Stomp, Crossface, DDT
    Brief Description:   Chikayo Nagashima brought her technical skills and experience to Sendai Girls, participating in matches that highlighted her ability to blend striking with precise grappling. Her guest appearances were marked by competitive bouts that showcased her veteran savvy.

      Chisako Kanari  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, tag team competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with striking and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Crossbody, Snap Suplex, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Chisako Kanari was primarily involved in tag team matches during her time in Sendai Girls. She used her speed and agility to complement her partners, delivering performances that focused on quick strikes and technical maneuvers.

      Chris Brookes  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with technical and striking elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Octopus Stretch, Slingshot Cutter, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Chris Brookes brought a unique hybrid style to his guest appearance, blending technical grappling with striking. Known for his adaptability, he engaged in matches that showcased his ability to work fluidly with different styles, making him a versatile mid card competitor.

      Command Bolshoi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submission and grappling focus
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface Chickenwing, Leglock, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Command Bolshoi's guest appearances were defined by her technical mastery and veteran presence. Known for her smooth transitions and ability to control the pace, she engaged in matches that highlighted her grappling skills and strategic approach.

      Crazy Mary Dobson  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hardcore competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hardcore, with brawling and high risk moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Death Valley Driver, Diving Double Foot Stomp, Chair assisted Senton
    Brief Description:   Crazy Mary Dobson's appearance in Sendai Girls brought a hardcore edge to the promotion. Known for her willingness to use weapons and take risks, she delivered matches that emphasized physicality and high impact maneuvers, making her a memorable mid card guest.

      Crea  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Arm Drag, Dropkick, Snapmare
    Brief Description:   Crea focused on traditional wrestling techniques during her time in Sendai Girls. As a developing competitor, she engaged in lower mid card matches that helped her refine her skills and gain experience in the ring.

      Dalys  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, lucha libre competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Lucha inspired, with high flying and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Tilt a Whirl Backbreaker, Springboard Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Dalys brought her lucha libre style to Sendai Girls, delivering matches that combined aerial maneuvers with technical grappling. Her guest appearance allowed her to showcase the vibrant and dynamic elements of lucha, adding an international flavor to the mid card.

      Dalys la Caribena  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and lucha elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Flying Crossbody, Dropkick, Northern Lights Suplex
    Brief Description:   Dalys la Caribena's guest appearance was marked by her technical proficiency and ability to integrate lucha style moves into her matches. She participated in competitive bouts that emphasized her adaptability and striking skills, making her a versatile mid card talent.

      DASH Chisako  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2006 Present
    Position on the Card:   Main event, tag team specialist and singles star
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Foot Stomp, Swanton Bomb, Missile Dropkick
    Brief Description:   DASH Chisako is a cornerstone of Sendai Girls, known for her versatility as both a singles competitor and tag team specialist. With her high flying style, she has delivered standout performances in main events, tag tournaments, and high stakes singles matches, establishing herself as one of the promotion's most dynamic and enduring stars.

      Demi Bennett  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinebuster, Running Clothesline, Northern Lights Suplex
    Brief Description:   Demi Bennett's appearance showcased her power and athleticism, bringing a mix of strength and agility to Sendai Girls. She participated in matches that allowed her to demonstrate her ability to overpower opponents, making her a solid mid card guest.

      Devil Masami  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2011 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Powerbomb, Sleeper Hold, Brainbuster
    Brief Description:   Devil Masami's appearances in Sendai Girls brought a sense of history and power to the ring. Known for her strong style and veteran status, she delivered hard hitting matches that emphasized her strength and technical acumen, providing a connection to the storied past of joshi wrestling.

      Dump Matsumoto  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, legendary brawler
    Wrestling Style:   Brawling, with hardcore and power elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Piledriver, Weapon assisted Strikes
    Brief Description:   Dump Matsumoto made a special appearance in Sendai Girls, bringing her signature brawling and hardcore style to the promotion. Known for her aggressive, no holds barred approach, she delivered a memorable performance that showcased her enduring rebellious persona.

      Dynamite Kansai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2011 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, strong style veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strong style and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Splash Mountain (Sit out Powerbomb), Lariat, Diving Leg Drop
    Brief Description:   Dynamite Kansai was known for her powerful and impactful wrestling style. Her guest appearances in Sendai Girls were marked by hard hitting matches that highlighted her strength and precision, earning her respect as a formidable opponent.

      Eagle Sawai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2011 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Body Slam, Chokehold
    Brief Description:   Eagle Sawai brought her veteran presence and powerful style to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that focused on her ability to dominate opponents with brute strength. Her appearances were characterized by solid, hard hitting bouts that emphasized her toughness.

      Emi Sakura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical and charismatic
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with technical moves and comedy elements
    Three Signature Moves:   La Magistral Cradle, Moonsault, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Emi Sakura’s guest appearance highlighted her versatile wrestling style, blending technical skill with comedic elements. She participated in matches that showcased her ability to entertain while delivering crisp, technical maneuvers, adding a unique flavor to the card.

      Esui  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Arm Drag, Leg Sweep, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Esui’s guest appearance was marked by her traditional wrestling style, focusing on fundamental moves. She participated in matches that allowed her to showcase her technical skills and adaptability as an international competitor.

      Etsuko Mita  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2010 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran technical wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Death Valley Driver, Missile Dropkick, Leg Lariat
    Brief Description:   Etsuko Mita brought her technical prowess and veteran experience to Sendai Girls, participating in competitive matches that emphasized her ability to control the pace. Her guest appearances allowed fans to see her blend of precision strikes and smooth grappling.

      Evie (Dakota Kai)  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Double Foot Stomp, Running Kick, Springboard Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Evie, known for her agility and high flying style, brought an exciting dynamic to her guest appearance in Sendai Girls. Her matches were fast paced, featuring a mix of aerial maneuvers and precise strikes, making her a standout international competitor in the mid card.

      Female Predator Amazon  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with brawling
    Three Signature Moves:   Chokeslam, Running Powerslam, Big Boot
    Brief Description:   Female Predator Amazon’s time in Sendai Girls was marked by her powerful, brawling style. She engaged in matches that highlighted her strength and imposing presence, often overpowering opponents with sheer force.

      Fuka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, charismatic grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submission and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Fujiwara Armbar, Roundhouse Kick, Fisherman Suplex
    Brief Description:   Fuka brought her charisma and technical skills to her guest appearance, engaging in matches that showcased her smooth grappling and striking abilities. Her style emphasized precision and control, making her a noteworthy addition to the mid card during her stint.

      Gabai Ji chan  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic character
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic and basic wrestling elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhand Chop, Comedic Roll Up, Shoulder Tackle
    Brief Description:   Gabai Ji chan was a comedic act who provided lighthearted entertainment in Sendai Girls. His matches often featured humorous antics and exaggerated moves, offering a fun and engaging diversion from the more serious bouts on the card.

      GAMI  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran technician
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submission and comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Sleeper Hold, Fisherman Suplex, Headbutt
    Brief Description:   GAMI brought her blend of technical wrestling and humor to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that combined precise grappling with lighthearted antics. Her presence added a unique dynamic to the mid card, balancing competitive action with entertainment.

      Gigi Rey  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Gigi Rey made a brief appearance in Sendai Girls, showcasing her traditional wrestling skills. She participated in lower mid card matches that emphasized her agility and technical grappling, allowing her to connect with the audience as an international competitor.

      Gisele Shaw  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, high flying competitor
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and technical maneuvers
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Moonsault, Superkick, Tilt a Whirl Backbreaker
    Brief Description:   Gisele Shaw brought her high energy, high flying style to her guest appearance in Sendai Girls. Known for her agility and dynamic offense, she participated in matches that highlighted her speed and ability to perform aerial maneuvers with precision.

      Hailey Hatred  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2011 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves and brawling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, German Suplex, Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   Hailey Hatred was known for her strong style and power based wrestling. Her guest appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her ability to dominate matches through sheer strength and aggression, making her a force to be reckoned with in the upper mid card.

      Hamuko Hoshi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, comedic and powerful
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Splash, Hip Attack, Lariat
    Brief Description:   Hamuko Hoshi's guest appearances in Sendai Girls featured a mix of comedy and power based wrestling. Known for her playful persona, she delivered matches that balanced humor with effective in ring action, engaging fans with her unique approach.

      Hana Kimura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, charismatic rising star
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Running Boot, Small Package Driver
    Brief Description:   Hana Kimura's brief stint in Sendai Girls showcased her charisma and in ring versatility. Known for her ability to blend striking and technical maneuvers, she participated in competitive matches that highlighted her emerging star quality.

      Hanako Kobayashi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snapmare, Dropkick, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Hanako Kobayashi was a developing talent who focused on traditional wrestling techniques. Her matches in the lower mid card helped her build her skills, combining basic grappling with strikes to establish her in ring presence.

      Hanako Nakamori  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2013 2015 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, strong style technician
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with striking and submissions
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex, Cross Arm Breaker
    Brief Description:   Hanako Nakamori's guest appearances featured her strong style approach, blending sharp strikes with effective submission holds. Known for her toughness and technical acumen, she delivered competitive matches that showcased her precision and intensity.

      Harley Saito  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with kicks and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Spin Kick, German Suplex, Fisherman Suplex
    Brief Description:   Harley Saito brought her veteran experience and strong striking style to Sendai Girls. Her matches were characterized by precise, powerful kicks and grappling techniques, emphasizing her status as a seasoned competitor during her guest appearance.

      Hartley Jackson  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with brawling and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Running Powerslam, Suplex
    Brief Description:   Hartley Jackson's guest appearance was marked by his powerful, brawling style. Known for his physicality and strength, he engaged in matches that emphasized his ability to dominate opponents with a mix of raw power and technical prowess.

      Haruka Matsuo  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snapmare, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Haruka Matsuo’s brief appearance in Sendai Girls was focused on her developing skills as a junior competitor. She utilized speed and technical grappling to navigate her matches, showcasing potential as she worked to refine her abilities.

      Haruka Umesaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior rising star
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with speed and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Crossface, Diving Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Haruka Umesaki emerged as a promising talent in Sendai Girls, known for her agility and technical prowess. Her matches featured a blend of high speed moves and smooth grappling, positioning her as a dynamic presence in the junior division.

      HATE  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, striking specialist
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on kicks and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Heel Kick, Lariat, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   HATE’s appearance in Sendai Girls highlighted his aggressive striking style. Known for delivering powerful kicks and precise attacks, he engaged in matches that emphasized his ability to dominate with force and technique.

      Hazuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Senton, Codebreaker, Springboard Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Hazuki brought her high flying abilities to Sendai Girls, known for her agility and fast paced offense. Her matches were characterized by quick maneuvers and aerial assaults, making her a thrilling addition to the mid card during her guest appearance.

      Heidi Katrina  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strength and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Powerslam, Running Clothesline, Backbreaker
    Brief Description:   Heidi Katrina’s time in Sendai Girls was marked by her impressive strength and power based wrestling. As an international guest, she brought a physical presence to the mid card, often overpowering opponents with her combination of strength and technical grappling.

      Hibiki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, unique character
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Knee Strike, German Suplex, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Hibiki stands out for her unique in ring persona and solid technical abilities. Her matches in Sendai Girls showcase a mix of striking and grappling, allowing her to engage in diverse and competitive mid card bouts.

      Hikari Minami  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2011 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Sunset Flip
    Brief Description:   Hikari Minami’s appearances in Sendai Girls focused on her agility and speed, positioning her as a capable junior competitor. Her matches emphasized quick, technical maneuvers, showcasing her ability to keep up with more experienced wrestlers.

      Hikaru Shida  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2013 2015 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical striker
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Falcon Arrow, Running Knee Strike, Vertical Suplex
    Brief Description:   Hikaru Shida brought her well rounded wrestling style to Sendai Girls, blending striking with technical grappling. Known for her versatility, she participated in competitive matches that showcased her ability to adapt and excel against a range of opponents.

      Hiragi Kurumi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse junior
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strong style elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Powerbomb, Running Splash
    Brief Description:   Hiragi Kurumi's guest appearances were marked by her strength and power based approach. As a junior competitor, she stood out for her ability to use strength to her advantage, engaging in matches that highlighted her power and resilience.

      Hiren  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 2012
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a focus on submissions and basic strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Armbar, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Hiren was a developing talent who focused on traditional grappling and submission techniques during her time in Sendai Girls. Her matches often featured fundamental moves, as she worked to build her skill set and establish herself in the lower mid card.

      HIRO'e  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Running Clothesline
    Brief Description:   HIRO'e focused on refining her technical skills during her time in Sendai Girls. She participated in matches that showcased her ability to blend basic grappling with striking, gradually building her experience in the lower mid card.

      Hiroe Nagahama  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a mix of submissions and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, German Suplex, Rolling Neckbreaker
    Brief Description:   Hiroe Nagahama brought her technical wrestling style to Sendai Girls, focusing on precision grappling and submissions. Her matches were characterized by her ability to control the pace and wear down opponents, making her a solid presence in the mid card.

      Hiromi Mimura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and quick strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Crossbody, Running Elbow Smash
    Brief Description:   Hiromi Mimura’s guest appearance in Sendai Girls showcased her agility and energetic style. Known for her quick movements and ability to execute rapid strikes, she participated in matches that emphasized her speed and junior wrestling abilities.

      Hiroyo Matsumoto  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2011, 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with technical grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Backdrop Driver, Running Powerbomb, Lariat
    Brief Description:   Hiroyo Matsumoto was known for her strength and power based style. Her appearances in Sendai Girls featured hard hitting matches where she used her strength to dominate opponents, blending power moves with effective grappling techniques.

      Honoka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Arm Drag, Hurricanrana
    Brief Description:   Honoka is a developing competitor who relies on speed and agility to gain an advantage. Her matches often feature fast paced exchanges and smooth transitions, positioning her as a promising talent in the lower mid card.

      Honori Hana  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Knee Strike, Snap Suplex, Crossface
    Brief Description:   Honori Hana has been building her reputation as a rising junior talent in Sendai Girls. Known for her ability to blend striking with technical moves, she participates in matches that emphasize her versatility and adaptability, making her a dynamic mid card competitor.

      Hyan  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of speed, agility, and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, Springboard Crossbody, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   Hyan's guest appearance brought an international flair to Sendai Girls, where she showcased her blend of speed, agility, and striking. Her matches were characterized by her fluid movements and ability to connect with the audience, making her a notable mid card competitor during her stint.

      Ikuto Hidaka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with submissions and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dragon Screw, STF, Snap DDT
    Brief Description:   Ikuto Hidaka’s guest appearance in Sendai Girls highlighted his technical prowess. Known for his precise grappling and submission skills, he engaged in matches that focused on technique and control, showcasing his ability to outmaneuver opponents.

      Io Shirai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, high flying ace
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Moonsault, 619, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Io Shirai’s appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her exceptional high flying ability and technical skill. Known for her agility and precise execution, she delivered standout performances that solidified her status as one of the top high flyers in the joshi wrestling scene.

      Isami Kodaka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hybrid striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with strikes and hardcore elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Superkick, Death Valley Driver, Diving Double Foot Stomp
    Brief Description:   Isami Kodaka’s guest appearance brought his unique mix of strong style and hardcore elements to Sendai Girls. Known for his striking and willingness to take risks, he participated in matches that added intensity and physicality to the mid card.

      Isla Dawn  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and submission elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging Northern Lights Suplex, Roundhouse Kick, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Isla Dawn's appearance in Sendai Girls highlighted her technical wrestling background. She participated in matches that allowed her to showcase her grappling and striking skills, providing a solid performance as an international guest in the lower mid card.

      Itsuki Aoki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, developing powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strong style elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Backdrop Driver, Running Powerslam
    Brief Description:   Itsuki Aoki has established herself as a developing powerhouse in Sendai Girls. Known for her strength and physicality, she engages in matches that emphasize her ability to dominate opponents with power moves, making her a notable presence in the mid card.

      Jaguar Yokota  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 2012 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, legendary technician
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Backbreaker, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Jaguar Yokota’s appearances in Sendai Girls added a touch of history and prestige. Known for her technical prowess and pioneering status in women's wrestling, she delivered matches that emphasized her smooth grappling and striking, showcasing why she remains a revered figure in the sport.

      Jennie Rose  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Running Bulldog, Elbow Smash
    Brief Description:   Jennie Rose brought a mix of technical and striking elements to her matches in Sendai Girls. Her guest appearances were characterized by solid performances that highlighted her ability to adapt and compete against a variety of opponents, establishing her as a capable lower mid card competitor.

      Jenny Rose  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with power moves and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Fisherman’s Suplex, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Jenny Rose’s guest stint showcased her blend of technical prowess and power. Known for her solid grappling and suplexes, she participated in competitive mid card matches that demonstrated her ability to combine technique with strength.

      Jessy Jackson  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with striking and basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snapmare, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Jessy Jackson’s appearance focused on developing her in ring abilities, relying on traditional wrestling techniques. She competed in lower mid card matches, working on refining her basic grappling and striking skills as she gained experience.

      Jinsei Shinzaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran presence
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and high flying elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Praying Powerbomb, Cartwheel Kick, Diving Headbutt
    Brief Description:   Jinsei Shinzaki's guest appearance brought a blend of traditional and high flying moves to Sendai Girls. Known for his charismatic persona and precise execution, he participated in matches that allowed him to display his veteran skills and unique style.

      Jody Threat  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinebuster, Running Clothesline, Suplex
    Brief Description:   Jody Threat brought her aggressive, power based style to Sendai Girls. Her matches emphasized her ability to dominate opponents with strength and solid grappling, making her a formidable international guest in the mid card.

      Jordynne Grace  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strong style elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Bearhug, Muscle Buster, Running Powerslam
    Brief Description:   Jordynne Grace’s guest appearance was defined by her strength and power. Known for her ability to outmuscle opponents, she delivered hard hitting matches that showcased her raw power and technical prowess, solidifying her place as a standout upper mid card guest.

      Jumonji Sisters (Dash Chisako & Sendai Sachiko)  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2006 2016
    Position on the Card:   Main event, tag team aces
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and precision
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Diving Foot Stomp, Double Dropkick, Tandem Suplex
    Brief Description:   The Jumonji Sisters, composed of Dash Chisako and Sendai Sachiko, were the cornerstone of the tag team division in Sendai Girls. Known for their seamless teamwork and high flying moves, they dominated the tag scene, delivering memorable and thrilling matches that highlighted their chemistry and dynamic in ring abilities.

      Jun Kasai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hardcore icon
    Wrestling Style:   Hardcore, with brawling and high risk moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Headbutt, Lariat, Death Valley Driver
    Brief Description:   Jun Kasai’s appearance brought his trademark hardcore style to Sendai Girls. Known for his fearless approach and willingness to use weapons, he participated in matches that emphasized brutal, high risk maneuvers, adding an edge to the mid card.

      Kagetsu  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2012
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising star
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and high flying
    Three Signature Moves:   450 Splash, Roundhouse Kick, Brainbuster
    Brief Description:   Kagetsu's early career in Sendai Girls showcased her versatility and charisma. She used a mix of striking and high flying techniques, developing into a dynamic competitor known for her agility and unpredictable style, making her a standout in the mid card.

      Kaho Kobayashi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Tornado DDT, Diving Crossbody, Hurricanrana
    Brief Description:   Kaho Kobayashi’s appearance highlighted her agility and aerial prowess. Known for her quick, high flying moves, she engaged in exciting, fast paced matches that showcased her ability to execute technical maneuvers with precision.

      KAIRI (Kairi Hojo)  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2016 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, international star
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Elbow Drop, Spear, Sliding D
    Brief Description:   KAIRI, known for her high flying abilities and pirate themed persona, delivered captivating performances during her appearances. Her matches were characterized by her signature Diving Elbow Drop and a mix of striking and grappling, making her a compelling competitor in the upper mid card.

      Kana (Asuka)  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with striking and submission
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Backfist, Cross Armbar, Hip Attack
    Brief Description:   Kana’s guest appearance brought her aggressive, strong style to Sendai Girls. Known for her sharp striking and submission skills, she participated in matches that showcased her technical prowess and no nonsense attitude, making a strong impression in the upper mid card.

      Kaneko Yurie  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Kaneko Yurie is a developing talent focusing on traditional wrestling techniques. Her matches emphasized fundamental grappling, positioning her as a solid, emerging competitor in the lower mid card, gaining experience and refining her skills.

      Kanjyouro Matsuyama  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic act
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic elements and basic wrestling
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhand Chop, Comedic Roll Up, Headlock
    Brief Description:   Kanjyouro Matsuyama's appearance in Sendai Girls was marked by his comedic, gimmick based style. His matches provided lighthearted entertainment, relying on humor and exaggerated moves to engage the audience, offering a fun contrast to more serious bouts.

      Kanon  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Springboard Arm Drag, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Kanon is a young, emerging junior competitor who focuses on speed and agility. Her matches are characterized by quick, fluid movements and technical grappling, making her a dynamic presence in the lower mid card as she continues to develop.

      Kaori Yoneyama  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 2016 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, versatile competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, grappling, and comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Foot Stomp, German Suplex, Roll Up
    Brief Description:   Kaori Yoneyama brought her versatile wrestling style to Sendai Girls, known for blending serious technical skills with comedic antics. Her matches often mixed intense grappling with lighthearted moments, making her a well rounded mid card performer who could adapt to various match styles.

      KAORU  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, high flying veteran
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with strong style elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Moonsault, Missile Dropkick, Superplex
    Brief Description:   KAORU’s appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her high flying abilities and veteran presence. Known for her daring aerial maneuvers and tough, resilient style, she participated in matches that highlighted her experience and willingness to take risks, making her a key figure in the upper mid card.

      Kaoru Ito  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Double Foot Stomp, Lariat, Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   Kaoru Ito's guest appearance brought her trademark power and aggression to Sendai Girls. Known for her hard hitting style and signature Diving Foot Stomp, she delivered intense matches that emphasized her strength and veteran experience, making a significant impact.

      Kay Lee Ray  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Swanton Bomb, Superkick, Gory Bomb
    Brief Description:   Kay Lee Ray's appearance showcased her agility and high flying offense. Known for her dynamic in ring style, she engaged in fast paced matches that highlighted her ability to execute aerial maneuvers with precision, making her a standout in the mid card.

      Kayoko Haruyama  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2012 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with technical and power elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, German Suplex, Diving Splash
    Brief Description:   Kayoko Haruyama's guest stint in Sendai Girls brought her technical grappling and strong style to the forefront. Known for her toughness and precise execution, she delivered competitive matches that showcased her ability to mix power and technique effectively.

      KAZUKI  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, technical wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and submission moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Cross Armbreaker, Rolling Elbow, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   KAZUKI participated in Sendai Girls as a guest competitor, focusing on a technical and traditional wrestling style. Her matches emphasized fundamental grappling and submissions, allowing her to showcase her skill set as a solid lower mid card competitor.

      Keiko Aono  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snapmare, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Keiko Aono's time in Sendai Girls was focused on developing her skills and gaining experience. She relied on speed and basic grappling to navigate her matches, positioning herself as a promising competitor in the lower mid card.

      Kellie Skater  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with striking and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Missile Dropkick, Suicide Dive, Rolling Elbow
    Brief Description:   Kellie Skater brought her high energy, high flying style to Sendai Girls during her guest appearance. Known for her agility and striking ability, she delivered exciting matches that showcased her willingness to take risks and engage in dynamic exchanges.

      Killer Kelly  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with striking and submission moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Dragon Sleeper, Running Dropkick, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Killer Kelly's guest appearance was characterized by her aggressive, strong style. Known for her precise striking and technical grappling, she participated in matches that emphasized her ability to dominate opponents with a mix of power and technical finesse.

      Kizuna Tanaka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossbody, Dropkick, Springboard Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Kizuna Tanaka is an emerging junior competitor known for her speed and agility. Her matches are marked by quick, fluid movements and smooth grappling, allowing her to gain experience and build her in ring repertoire in the lower mid card.

      Koguma  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and speed
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Crossbody, Hurricanrana, Moonsault
    Brief Description:   Koguma's guest appearance in Sendai Girls highlighted her high flying abilities. Known for her agility and fast paced style, she participated in matches that showcased her ability to execute aerial maneuvers with ease, making her a dynamic presence in the mid card.

      Kohaku  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Kohaku is a developing junior competitor who focuses on traditional wrestling techniques. Her matches are characterized by solid, basic grappling and strikes, allowing her to gain experience and refine her skills in the lower mid card.

      Kohei Sato  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, strong style competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with striking and power based moves
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Lariat, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Kohei Sato brought his hard hitting, strong style approach to his guest appearance in Sendai Girls. Known for his precision and power, he participated in matches that highlighted his striking ability and toughness, making him a solid mid card competitor.

      Konami  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical striker
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a focus on submissions and kicks
    Three Signature Moves:   Triangle Lancer, Rear Naked Choke, Buzzsaw Kick
    Brief Description:   Konami's appearance in Sendai Girls showcased her blend of technical submissions and sharp, precise kicks. Known for her grappling skills and striking accuracy, she engaged in competitive mid card matches that highlighted her ability to wear down opponents effectively.

      Konosuke Takeshita  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with strength and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Flying Knee, Blue Thunder Bomb
    Brief Description:   Konosuke Takeshita brought his dynamic hybrid style to Sendai Girls, blending power and agility. Known for his versatility, he engaged in matches that showcased his strength, technical ability, and speed, making him a standout guest competitor in the mid card.

      Kris Wolf  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, charismatic high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and speed
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Crossbody, Running Bulldog, Spinning Heel Kick
    Brief Description:   Kris Wolf's guest appearances were marked by her playful charisma and high flying style. Known for her agility and energetic in ring persona, she engaged in matches that were fast paced and entertaining, resonating well with the audience as a fun mid card act.

      Kuroshio TOKYO Japan  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, unique character
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with agility and comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Standing Moonsault, Spinning Back Kick, Roll Up
    Brief Description:   Kuroshio TOKYO Japan’s guest appearance brought a unique and quirky presence to the mid card. Known for blending comedic elements with agile moves, his matches in Sendai Girls provided lighthearted entertainment, making him a distinctive character during his stint.

      Kyoko Inoue  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 2012 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Running Powerbomb, Splash
    Brief Description:   Kyoko Inoue's guest appearances were defined by her strength and veteran presence. Known for her powerful moves and endurance, she engaged in intense matches that emphasized her dominance and experience, adding a touch of legacy to Sendai Girls' upper mid card.

      Kyoko Kimura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2013 2015 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, unorthodox brawler
    Wrestling Style:   Brawling, with striking and hardcore elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Big Boot, Kimura Lock, Diving Senton
    Brief Description:   Kyoko Kimura’s appearances showcased her unorthodox and aggressive brawling style. Known for her wild, unpredictable approach, she engaged in matches that combined striking with a hint of hardcore tactics, making her a chaotic yet compelling figure in the mid card.

      Kyusei Meiko Satomura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2006 Present
    Position on the Card:   Main event, founding ace
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Death Valley Bomb, Scorpion Rising, Rear Naked Choke
    Brief Description:   Meiko Satomura is the cornerstone of Sendai Girls, known for her strong style and technical prowess. As a founding member and ace of the promotion, she has consistently delivered high caliber matches, demonstrating precision and endurance. Her leadership and in ring ability have made her a revered figure in women's wrestling, solidifying her as the main event attraction.

      Kyusei Ninja Ranmaru  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, gimmick character
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with striking and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Heel Kick, Ninja Chop, Rolling Splash
    Brief Description:   Kyusei Ninja Ranmaru's appearance was defined by her playful, ninja themed persona. Known for blending humor with agility, she participated in matches that brought a lighthearted, gimmick based element to the lower mid card, offering fans a mix of entertainment and action.

      La Comandante  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with brawling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinebuster, Big Boot, Lariat
    Brief Description:   La Comandante brought her imposing, power based style to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that emphasized her strength and physical dominance. Known for her tough brawling tactics, she provided a formidable challenge to her opponents during her guest appearance in the mid card.

      La Jarochita  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, lucha libre competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Lucha style, with high flying and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Tilt a Whirl Backbreaker, Diving Crossbody
    Brief Description:   La Jarochita brought her lucha libre flair to Sendai Girls, showcasing a blend of agility and technical skills. Her matches were fast paced and dynamic, emphasizing her ability to execute high flying maneuvers, making her a standout mid card guest during her time in the promotion.

      La Rosa Negra  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Elbow Drop, Spinning Heel Kick, Moonsault
    Brief Description:   La Rosa Negra’s guest stint highlighted her high energy, high flying style. Known for her agility and ability to connect with the audience, she engaged in matches that were vibrant and thrilling, showcasing her aerial abilities as a solid mid card presence.

      La Silueta  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, lucha libre guest
    Wrestling Style:   Lucha style, with high flying and fast paced offense
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Arm Drag, Hurricanrana, Diving Splash
    Brief Description:   La Silueta brought the essence of lucha libre to her matches in Sendai Girls. Known for her quick, fluid movements and high flying techniques, she participated in matches that were engaging and highlighted her agility and technical finesse.

      Lena Kross  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Running Clothesline
    Brief Description:   Lena Kross’s appearance focused on building her foundational wrestling skills. She participated in lower mid card matches that emphasized basic grappling and striking, showcasing her potential as she developed her in ring abilities.

      Leon  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2012 2014 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with speed and precision
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Crossface, Diving Elbow Drop
    Brief Description:   Leon’s appearances in Sendai Girls highlighted her technical expertise and agility. Known for her precision and smooth transitions, she participated in matches that allowed her to showcase her ability to control the pace with grappling and quick, effective strikes.

      Mabutachi Manjimanji  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic act
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhand Chop, Rolling Tackle, Comedic Roll Up
    Brief Description:   Mabutachi Manjimanji's guest appearance was marked by his playful and comedic approach. Known for incorporating humor into his matches, he engaged the audience with lighthearted antics and exaggerated moves, providing comic relief in the lower mid card.

      Madeline  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snapmare, Cross Armbar
    Brief Description:   Madeline is a developing talent focusing on speed and technical grappling. Her matches often feature quick, smooth transitions, allowing her to build her skills and establish herself as a promising lower mid card competitor in Sendai Girls.

      Magenta  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Magenta's time in Sendai Girls was centered on her development as an emerging competitor. She focused on traditional wrestling techniques, participating in matches that showcased her grappling and striking, helping her refine her in ring style.

      Mai Ichii  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 2015 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submission moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, Dropkick, Fisherman’s Suplex
    Brief Description:   Mai Ichii's guest appearances highlighted her technical wrestling ability. Known for her precise grappling and submission skills, she participated in competitive matches that showcased her technique and adaptability in the mid card.

      Mai Mizuochi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising star
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with speed, agility, and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Running Knee Strike, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Mai Mizuochi has quickly become a rising star in Sendai Girls, known for her blend of speed, agility, and technical skills. Her matches are dynamic, showcasing her ability to transition seamlessly between fast paced offense and solid grappling, establishing her as a key competitor in the mid card.

      Makoto  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2013 2015 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, versatile competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, grappling, and high flying moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Double Foot Stomp, Roundhouse Kick
    Brief Description:   Makoto's guest appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her versatility in the ring. Known for blending striking, technical grappling, and occasional high flying maneuvers, she engaged in competitive matches that highlighted her adaptability and skill.

      Makoto Maeda  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with striking and basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Makoto Maeda participated as a junior competitor, focusing on traditional wrestling techniques. Her matches were characterized by solid, basic grappling and strikes, providing her with a platform to develop her skills in the lower mid card.

      Manami  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Crossbody, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Manami is an emerging competitor known for her agility and speed. Her matches often feature quick, dynamic movements, allowing her to navigate through bouts with agility and smooth transitions, making her a promising presence in the lower mid card.

      Manami Katsu  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, strong style wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of power and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, German Suplex, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Manami Katsu's appearances were defined by her strong style approach, blending power with technical grappling. Known for her aggressive and hard hitting moves, she participated in matches that emphasized her physicality and in ring toughness, solidifying her spot in the mid card.

      Manami Toyota  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2011 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Main event, legendary high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and technical prowess
    Three Signature Moves:   Japanese Ocean Cyclone Suplex, Moonsault, Missile Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Manami Toyota’s appearances brought her iconic high flying style to Sendai Girls, where she delivered performances that celebrated her legendary status. Known for her agility, speed, and technical excellence, she engaged in main event bouts that emphasized her enduring skill and unmatched athleticism.

      Mari Harada  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Mari Harada focused on refining her traditional wrestling skills during her time in Sendai Girls. Participating in lower mid card matches, she worked on developing her grappling techniques and striking, laying the foundation for her in ring career.

      Mari Manji  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical and striking moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Crossbody, Snapmare, Hurricanrana
    Brief Description:   Mari Manji is an emerging talent who relies on speed and agility. Her matches are characterized by quick, fluid movements and solid technical maneuvers, positioning her as a developing competitor with potential in the lower mid card.

      Maria  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Crossbody, Swinging Neckbreaker
    Brief Description:   Maria was known for her speed and agility, engaging in matches that showcased her ability to combine striking and basic grappling. Her presence in the lower mid card allowed her to develop her skills and gain in ring experience, positioning her as a reliable junior competitor.

      Maria de la Rosa  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strength and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinebuster, Running Powerslam, Suplex
    Brief Description:   Maria de la Rosa brought her power based style to Sendai Girls, showcasing her strength in competitive mid card matches. Known for her ability to dominate opponents with powerful grappling moves, she provided a physical, imposing presence during her guest appearance.

      Mariko Yoshida  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 2012 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submission and grappling focus
    Three Signature Moves:   Spider Twist, Missile Dropkick, Cross Armbar
    Brief Description:   Mariko Yoshida’s appearances were defined by her technical mastery and smooth grappling. Known for her intricate submission techniques and precise execution, she engaged in matches that emphasized her technical prowess, making her a standout figure in the upper mid card.

      Martina  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, charismatic and comedic
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with a mix of brawling and comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Codebreaker, Running Knee, Roll Up
    Brief Description:   Martina’s appearance in Sendai Girls brought her signature blend of charisma and humor to the mid card. Known for her fun, party themed persona, she entertained fans with her lively antics and in ring style, which combined brawling with comedic moments.

      Masato Tanaka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hardcore veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with hardcore and power based elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Sliding D, Roaring Elbow, Superplex
    Brief Description:   Masato Tanaka’s guest appearance in Sendai Girls highlighted his strong, hard hitting style. Known for his experience in hardcore wrestling, he participated in matches that showcased his toughness and striking power, adding a level of intensity to the mid card.

      Masha Slamovich  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, grappling, and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Russian Leg Sweep, Bridging German Suplex, Roundhouse Kick
    Brief Description:   Masha Slamovich brought her hybrid style to Sendai Girls, combining striking, grappling, and power moves. Known for her versatility, she participated in matches that emphasized her ability to adapt to various in ring situations, making her a dynamic presence in the mid card.

      Maya Yukihi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical and agile
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a mix of speed and precision
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Back Kick, Crossface, Bridging Suplex
    Brief Description:   Maya Yukihi’s appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her technical abilities and agility. Known for her precision and smooth grappling, she engaged in matches that highlighted her ability to control the pace and execute intricate maneuvers effectively.

      Mayu Iwatani  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, high flying ace
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Dragon Suplex, Frog Splash, Spinning Kick
    Brief Description:   Mayu Iwatani’s guest appearances brought her high flying, fast paced style to Sendai Girls. Known for her agility and resilience, she participated in matches that were thrilling and dynamic, showcasing her ability to connect with the audience and deliver high impact moves.

      Mayuka Nizeki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Mayuka Nizeki is a developing talent focused on traditional wrestling techniques. Her matches are characterized by fundamental grappling and strikes, allowing her to gain experience and improve her in ring abilities in the lower mid card.

      Mayumi Ozaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2010, 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran brawler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with brawling and hardcore elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Tequila Sunrise (Half Nelson Suplex), Spinning Backfist, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Mayumi Ozaki’s appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her aggressive, brawling style. Known for her hard hitting approach and willingness to bend the rules, she engaged in matches that were intense and physical, bringing a veteran presence to the upper mid card.

      Medusa Complex (Millie McKenzie & Charli Evans)  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, grappling, and teamwork
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Tandem Dropkick, Assisted DDT
    Brief Description:   Medusa Complex, consisting of Millie McKenzie and Charli Evans, brought their cohesive teamwork and aggressive style to Sendai Girls. Known for their ability to blend striking and grappling, they delivered competitive tag team matches that emphasized their chemistry and coordination.

      Mei Hoshizuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Crossbody, Dropkick, Moonsault
    Brief Description:   Mei Hoshizuki’s guest appearance was marked by her quick, high flying style. Known for her agility and ability to execute aerial maneuvers smoothly, she participated in matches that showcased her dynamic offense, making her a notable junior competitor in the mid card.

      Mei Suruga  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2020 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, charismatic high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with a mix of speed and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Crossbody, Bridging German Suplex, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Mei Suruga brought her lively personality and high flying abilities to her matches in Sendai Girls. Known for her quick, agile movements and engaging in ring persona, she participated in fast paced matches that highlighted her ability to connect with the audience and execute technical moves with flair.

      Meiko Satomura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2006 Present
    Position on the Card:   Main event, founding ace and leader
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a blend of striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Death Valley Bomb, Scorpio Rising (High Roundhouse Kick), Rear Naked Choke
    Brief Description:   Meiko Satomura is the backbone of Sendai Girls, known for her leadership and exceptional in ring skills. As a founding member, she has consistently been the top performer, blending precise striking and technical grappling to deliver classic matches. Her influence extends beyond the ring as a mentor, making her an iconic figure in the promotion's history.

      Meiko Tanaka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Meiko Tanaka is a rising talent in the lower mid card of Sendai Girls. Focusing on traditional wrestling techniques, her matches emphasize fundamental moves and solid grappling, showcasing her potential as she continues to develop her skills.

      Michiko Miyagi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2020
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, unique character and rising star
    Wrestling Style:   Striking based, with an unorthodox and charismatic approach
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Backfist, German Suplex, Diving Elbow Drop
    Brief Description:   Michiko Miyagi made a name for herself in Sendai Girls with her distinctive persona and striking heavy style. Known for her charisma and unorthodox approach, she delivered performances that blended power with a theatrical flair, establishing her as a key figure in the upper mid card.

      Midori  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Arm Drag, Crossbody, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Midori’s matches focused on speed and technical skill, making her a promising junior competitor. She often used quick, agile movements to her advantage, participating in lower mid card matches that helped her build a foundation in the ring.

      Mika Iida  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, technical junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with grappling and submission elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Sleeper Hold, Snap Suplex, Rolling Neckbreaker
    Brief Description:   Mika Iida’s guest appearance was defined by her technical wrestling style. She focused on grappling and submissions, delivering matches that showcased her ability to control opponents with precision, making her a solid lower mid card talent.

      Mika Iwata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 Present
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, striking specialist
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on kicks and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex, Missile Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Mika Iwata has been a prominent figure in Sendai Girls, known for her strong style and striking prowess. Her matches are characterized by her sharp, precise kicks and technical grappling, making her a reliable upper mid card competitor who often delivers hard hitting, competitive bouts.

      Mika Mizunuma  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with a blend of grappling and strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snapmare, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Mika Mizunuma is working on building her traditional wrestling skills, focusing on fundamental techniques. Her matches often feature straightforward grappling and striking, positioning her as a growing talent in the lower mid card of Sendai Girls.

      Mika Shirahime  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submissions and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, Bridging German Suplex, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Mika Shirahime brought her technical prowess to her guest appearance in Sendai Girls. Known for her smooth grappling and submission skills, she participated in matches that emphasized her precision and control, showcasing her talent as a solid mid card wrestler.

      Mikado  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Mikado is a developing wrestler known for her speed and agility. Her matches often feature fast paced sequences and smooth transitions, positioning her as a promising talent in the lower mid card of Sendai Girls.

      Mikoto Shindo  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising technical wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a blend of grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Arm Drag, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Mikoto Shindo has been rising through the ranks in Sendai Girls, known for her technical abilities and solid grappling. Her matches showcase her ability to combine technical maneuvers with effective strikes, establishing her as a reliable mid card competitor who continues to improve and impress.

      Millie McKenzie  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a blend of power moves and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Spear, Cutter
    Brief Description:   Millie McKenzie's guest appearance in Sendai Girls highlighted her strength and technical prowess. Known for her powerful suplexes and aggressive style, she delivered competitive matches that showcased her ability to dominate opponents, making her a solid mid card international guest.

      Mina Shirakawa  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Crossbody, Dropkick, Facebuster
    Brief Description:   Mina Shirakawa brought her charismatic and energetic style to her guest stint in Sendai Girls. Known for her agility and quick strikes, she participated in matches that emphasized her developing in ring skills, positioning her as a promising emerging talent in the lower mid card.

      Minori Makiba  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with a focus on grappling and strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Minori Makiba's time in Sendai Girls was marked by her focus on developing fundamental wrestling skills. She participated in lower mid card matches that emphasized basic grappling and strikes, helping her gain experience and build her in ring abilities.

      Minoru Suzuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, strong style legend
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on submissions and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Gotch Style Piledriver, Sleeper Hold, Penalty Kick
    Brief Description:   Minoru Suzuki's guest appearance brought his legendary strong style to Sendai Girls. Known for his brutal strikes and submission expertise, he delivered intense matches that showcased his ability to control and dominate his opponents, leaving a lasting impression in the upper mid card.

      Mio Momono  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, agile and technical junior
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Bridging German Suplex, Hurricanrana
    Brief Description:   Mio Momono brought her agility and technical grappling to her guest appearances. Known for her quick and dynamic in ring style, she participated in matches that emphasized her ability to execute fluid and precise moves, making her a standout in the mid card.

      Mio Shirai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2011 2012 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, versatile striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of striking and technical maneuvers
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, Diving Double Foot Stomp, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Mio Shirai's appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her versatile style, blending striking with technical finesse. Known for her agility and precise execution, she delivered competitive matches that highlighted her adaptability and skill, making her a significant presence in the upper mid card.

      Miria Koga  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Crossbody, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Miria Koga is an emerging talent in Sendai Girls, known for her speed and technical moves. Her matches often feature fast paced action and smooth transitions, positioning her as a promising junior competitor in the lower mid card.

      Misa Kagura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and basic strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Misa Kagura's appearance in Sendai Girls focused on her traditional wrestling skills. Known for her straightforward grappling, she engaged in matches that helped her refine her abilities and gain valuable in ring experience in the lower mid card.

      Misae Genki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2010 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power based grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, German Suplex, Running Powerslam
    Brief Description:   Misae Genki's appearances brought her powerful, strong style to the forefront. Known for her strength and physical dominance, she participated in matches that showcased her ability to overpower opponents, making her a key figure in the upper mid card.

      Misaki Ohata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2011 2014 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with submission and speed based elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, Missile Dropkick, Bridging Suplex
    Brief Description:   Misaki Ohata's guest appearances in Sendai Girls highlighted her technical and submission prowess. Known for her smooth grappling and ability to transition seamlessly between moves, she engaged in competitive matches that emphasized her technical skill and precision, making her a reliable mid card competitor.

      Miyako Morino  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Miyako Morino's guest appearance was marked by her focus on traditional wrestling techniques. She participated in matches that emphasized fundamental grappling, helping her gain valuable in ring experience as a lower mid card competitor.

      Miyu Amasaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Crossbody, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Miyu Amasaki is a developing competitor in Sendai Girls known for her speed and agility. Her matches often feature quick, dynamic movements and smooth grappling, positioning her as a promising lower mid card talent who continues to refine her skills.

      Miyuki Takase  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerful and versatile
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of power moves and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, German Suplex, Missile Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Miyuki Takase's guest appearances showcased her strong, powerful style. Known for her ability to blend power moves with technical grappling, she engaged in competitive matches that highlighted her versatility, making her a solid presence in the mid card.

      Mizuki Endo  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Crossbody, Dropkick, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   Mizuki Endo is a junior competitor known for her speed and agility. She participates in fast paced matches that emphasize quick movements and smooth transitions, positioning her as a developing talent in the lower mid card of Sendai Girls.

      Mizuki Kato  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Mizuki Kato’s time in Sendai Girls was focused on developing her grappling skills. She engaged in matches that helped her refine her techniques, allowing her to build a foundation and establish herself as a solid competitor in the lower mid card.

      Mochi Miyagi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2012 2014 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, comedic and power based
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Splash, Lariat, Hip Attack
    Brief Description:   Mochi Miyagi’s guest appearances brought a mix of comedy and power to the mid card of Sendai Girls. Known for her playful persona and strong moves, she delivered entertaining performances that combined humor with effective wrestling, making her a fan favorite.

      Mochi Natsumi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising technical competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a focus on grappling and submission
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, Bridging German Suplex, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Mochi Natsumi is known for her technical prowess and precision grappling. Her matches in Sendai Girls often emphasize her ability to control opponents with submissions, making her a rising mid card competitor who consistently delivers solid performances.

      Moeka Haruhi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2017
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snapmare, Springboard Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Moeka Haruhi’s time in Sendai Girls was characterized by her agility and speed. As a junior competitor, she focused on building her skills through matches that showcased her quick, fluid movements, positioning herself as a promising talent in the lower mid card.

      Momo Tani  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Arm Drag, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Momo Tani is an emerging competitor who is developing her traditional wrestling skills. She participates in matches that focus on fundamental grappling, helping her gain experience and build her in ring capabilities in the lower mid card.

      Momo Watanabe  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hard hitting striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on strikes and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Knee Strike, Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Momo Watanabe’s guest appearance was marked by her aggressive, striking heavy style. Known for her powerful kicks and hard hitting moves, she participated in matches that highlighted her strength and precision, making her a formidable mid card competitor during her stint.

      Mori Noto  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Springboard Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Mori Noto is an emerging junior competitor known for her speed and agility. Her matches are characterized by quick, fluid movements and solid technical grappling, positioning her as a promising talent who is gradually refining her skills in the lower mid card.

      Mr. Buddha Man  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic act
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic and traditional wrestling elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhand Chop, Comedic Roll Up, Running Elbow Drop
    Brief Description:   Mr. Buddha Man's appearance in Sendai Girls was marked by his playful, comedic persona. Known for incorporating humor into his matches, he provided lighthearted entertainment with exaggerated moves and comedic antics, offering a fun diversion on the lower mid card.

      Nana Kawasa  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Nana Kawasa focused on building her skills as an emerging competitor in Sendai Girls. Her matches emphasized traditional grappling techniques, allowing her to refine her in ring abilities and gain experience in the lower mid card.

      Nanae Takahashi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2011 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of power moves and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Nana☆Racka (Spinning Powerbomb), Lariat, Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Nanae Takahashi brought her powerful, veteran presence to her guest appearances in Sendai Girls. Known for her strength and experience, she engaged in intense matches that emphasized her ability to dominate opponents, making her a significant figure in the upper mid card.

      Nanami  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Crossbody, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Nanami is a junior competitor known for her agility and quickness. Her matches in Sendai Girls feature fast paced action and smooth transitions, positioning her as an emerging talent in the lower mid card who continues to develop her skills.

      Nancy Mari  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Running Bulldog, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Nancy Mari’s brief appearance in Sendai Girls was focused on her development as a wrestler. She participated in matches that emphasized traditional wrestling techniques, allowing her to gain experience and work on her in ring fundamentals in the lower mid card.

      Natsuho Kaneko  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Crossbody, Snapmare, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Natsuho Kaneko is known for her agility and speed, using her quick movements to navigate matches in Sendai Girls. As an emerging junior talent, she continues to develop her skills, engaging in matches that allow her to showcase her dynamic style and potential.

      Natsuki Taiyo  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2010 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, high flying junior
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Moonsault, Tornado DDT, Missile Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Natsuki Taiyo’s guest appearances were characterized by her high flying, fast paced style. Known for her agility and ability to execute aerial maneuvers with precision, she engaged in matches that were exciting and dynamic, making her a standout in the mid card.

      Natsuko Tora  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, aggressive brawler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on striking and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Senton, Lariat, Death Valley Driver
    Brief Description:   Natsuko Tora’s appearance in Sendai Girls showcased her aggressive and brawling style. Known for her hard hitting moves and physical approach, she participated in matches that highlighted her strength and resilience, making her a formidable mid card competitor.

      Natsumi Maki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, agile and technical competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Diving Crossbody, Roundhouse Kick
    Brief Description:   Natsumi Maki brought her agility and technical finesse to her guest stint in Sendai Girls. Known for her quick movements and smooth grappling transitions, she engaged in matches that emphasized her ability to outmaneuver opponents, solidifying her as a skilled mid card presence.

      Natsupoi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, high flying junior
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and acrobatics
    Three Signature Moves:   Twisting Crossbody, Moonsault, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   Natsupoi's guest appearance showcased her high flying abilities and energetic style. Known for her acrobatics and agility, she delivered fast paced matches that emphasized her dynamic offense, making her a notable competitor in the mid card.

      Nina Samuels  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Knee Strike, Backbreaker, Suplex
    Brief Description:   Nina Samuels brought her hybrid style to Sendai Girls, blending striking with technical grappling. Known for her charisma and versatility, she engaged in matches that showcased her adaptability and solid in ring skills, establishing her as a solid mid card guest.

      Nyla Rose  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strength and brawling
    Three Signature Moves:   Beast Bomb (Powerbomb), Spear, Chokeslam
    Brief Description:   Nyla Rose's appearance was marked by her strength and dominating presence. Known for her ability to overpower opponents with sheer force, she participated in matches that emphasized her physicality and brawling skills, making her a standout upper mid card competitor.

      Oedo Tai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018 (Guest appearances as a group)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, heel faction
    Wrestling Style:   Heel tactics, with a mix of brawling and underhanded moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Team Suplex, Interference based Attacks, Low Blow
    Brief Description:   Oedo Tai, a notorious heel faction, brought their chaotic and rebellious style to Sendai Girls. Known for their underhanded tactics and brawling, they engaged in matches that often involved rule breaking and teamwork, adding a layer of unpredictability to the mid card.

      Otoko Sakari  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic character
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic elements and basic wrestling
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhand Chop, Comedic Roll Up, Shoulder Tackle
    Brief Description:   Otoko Sakari was a comedic act in Sendai Girls, known for his humorous persona and exaggerated moves. His matches provided lighthearted entertainment, relying on comedic antics and playful interactions, making him a fun addition to the lower mid card.

      Pinky Mayuka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Arm Drag, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Pinky Mayuka is an emerging competitor who relies on speed and agility. Her matches in Sendai Girls feature quick movements and basic grappling, allowing her to build her skills and develop her in ring presence as a promising lower mid card talent.

      Pretty Ota  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, gimmick character
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhead Chop, Comedic Headlock, Hip Toss
    Brief Description:   Pretty Ota's guest appearance was marked by his playful and gimmick heavy style. Known for bringing humor into the ring, he engaged in matches that emphasized exaggerated movements and lighthearted antics, providing comic relief in the lower mid card.

      Prominence  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 Present (Guest appearances as a group)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hardcore faction
    Wrestling Style:   Hardcore, with brawling and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Chair assisted Attacks, Team Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   Prominence, a faction known for their hardcore style, brought an element of chaos and intensity to Sendai Girls. With a focus on brawling and power based team moves, they participated in matches that showcased their aggressive and unorthodox approach, standing out as a formidable group in the mid card.

      Promise Braxton  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, agility, and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, Snap Suplex, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Promise Braxton brought a well rounded style to her guest appearance in Sendai Girls. Known for her mix of speed, striking, and technical grappling, she engaged in matches that highlighted her adaptability and in ring presence, making her a notable mid card guest.

      Queen Aminata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, charismatic and agile
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with striking and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Heel Kick, Crossbody, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Queen Aminata's appearance in Sendai Girls was characterized by her charisma and quick, agile style. Known for her vibrant personality, she participated in matches that emphasized her speed and ability to execute dynamic moves, adding flair to the lower mid card.

      Rabbit Mio  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Crossbody, Hurricanrana, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Rabbit Mio's guest appearances showcased her agility and high flying abilities. Known for her quick, acrobatic moves, she participated in matches that were fast paced and energetic, making her a standout junior competitor in the mid card.

      Rabbit Miu  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with technical and agility moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Springboard Arm Drag, Running Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Rabbit Miu's appearance focused on her agility and technical grappling. As a junior competitor, she engaged in matches that highlighted her speed and ability to execute smooth transitions, positioning her as a promising lower mid card talent.

      Raika  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Raika’s time in Sendai Girls was marked by her focus on traditional wrestling techniques. Participating in matches that emphasized fundamental grappling, she worked to build her skills and establish herself as a reliable competitor in the lower mid card.

      Ray  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2010 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, high flying junior
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and acrobatics
    Three Signature Moves:   Moonsault, Springboard Dropkick, Diving Elbow
    Brief Description:   Ray’s appearances were defined by her agility and acrobatic style. Known for her high flying maneuvers, she delivered exciting, fast paced matches that showcased her ability to execute aerial moves with precision, making her a thrilling mid card attraction.

      Ray Lyn  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international guest
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of striking, grappling, and speed
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Knee Strike, Snap Suplex, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Ray Lyn brought a dynamic, hybrid style to her guest appearance in Sendai Girls. Known for her versatility and adaptability, she participated in matches that highlighted her ability to blend striking, grappling, and agility, establishing her as a well rounded mid card competitor.

      Rea Marumori  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Running Clothesline
    Brief Description:   Rea Marumori focused on traditional wrestling techniques during her time in Sendai Girls. Her matches emphasized solid, fundamental moves, allowing her to gain experience and develop her skills as a lower mid card competitor.

      Red Energy  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Red Energy is a developing talent known for her speed and agility. Her matches feature quick, fluid movements and solid grappling, allowing her to refine her in ring skills and gain experience as a lower mid card competitor in Sendai Girls.

      Reiwa Ultima Powers  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2022 Present (Guest appearances as a faction)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, chaotic faction
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with brawling and team coordination
    Three Signature Moves:   Tandem Suplex, Double Lariat, Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   Reiwa Ultima Powers, a faction known for their powerful and chaotic style, brought an element of unpredictability to Sendai Girls. Their matches often involved coordinated team moves and brawling tactics, making them a formidable and aggressive presence in the mid card.

      Reo Hazuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Springboard Arm Drag, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Reo Hazuki is a developing talent known for her quick, agile style. Her matches often feature fast paced action and smooth transitions, positioning her as a promising junior competitor in the lower mid card of Sendai Girls.

      Reyna Isis  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international lucha competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Lucha style, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Tilt a Whirl Backbreaker, Springboard Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Reyna Isis brought her lucha libre style to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that showcased her agility and technical skill. Known for her quick, high flying maneuvers, she provided an exciting, international flair to the mid card during her guest appearance.

      Rhia O'Reilly  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, grappling, and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Neckbreaker, Suplex, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Rhia O'Reilly's appearance in Sendai Girls highlighted her hybrid style, combining striking, grappling, and power based moves. Known for her solid in ring presence, she engaged in matches that emphasized her ability to adapt and compete effectively, establishing herself as a mid card talent.

      Rian  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Crossbody, Dropkick, Snapmare
    Brief Description:   Rian is a junior competitor who relies on speed and agility. Her matches in Sendai Girls feature quick, dynamic movements and technical grappling, helping her build her skills and establish herself as an emerging talent in the lower mid card.

      Riho  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, agile high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Foot Stomp, Tiger Feint Kick (619), Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Riho's guest appearance in Sendai Girls showcased her agility and high flying capabilities. Known for her quickness and technical skill, she engaged in fast paced matches that highlighted her ability to execute precise and fluid maneuvers, making her a standout in the mid card.

      Riko Kaiju  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Springboard Arm Drag, Running Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Riko Kaiju is a developing junior competitor known for her agility and speed. Her matches often feature fast paced action, allowing her to showcase her quick movements and smooth transitions, positioning her as a promising talent in the lower mid card.

      Riko Kawahata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and basic striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Riko Kawahata has been building her skills as an emerging competitor in Sendai Girls. Focusing on traditional wrestling techniques, she participates in matches that allow her to refine her grappling and striking, gradually establishing herself as a solid lower mid card presence.

      Rin Kadokura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, dynamic and agile competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Knee Strike, Bridging German Suplex, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Rin Kadokura's appearances in Sendai Girls were defined by her agility and dynamic in ring style. Known for her speed and precise striking, she engaged in matches that showcased her versatility and ability to adapt, making her a key competitor in the mid card.

      Rina Yamashita  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, strong style brawler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of power moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, German Suplex, Death Valley Driver
    Brief Description:   Rina Yamashita's appearances were marked by her strong style approach, blending powerful strikes with aggressive grappling. Known for her hard hitting moves and resilience, she delivered intense matches that emphasized her toughness and in ring presence, making her a formidable figure in the upper mid card.

      RIOT Crown  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present (Faction)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rebellious faction
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with teamwork and brawling tactics
    Three Signature Moves:   Tandem Suplex, Double Lariat, Team assisted Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   RIOT Crown is a faction known for their aggressive and rebellious style. Operating as a cohesive unit, they participate in matches that involve strategic teamwork and power based moves, often engaging in brawls that add a chaotic element to the mid card, establishing their dominance as a faction.

      Risa Sera  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hardcore specialist
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of hardcore, striking, and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Knee Drop, Fisherman Buster, Diving Senton
    Brief Description:   Risa Sera’s appearances in Sendai Girls were characterized by her willingness to engage in hardcore style matches. Known for her aggressive approach and resilience, she participated in competitive bouts that highlighted her ability to blend hardcore elements with solid wrestling skills, making her a notable mid card competitor.

      Ruaka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Ruaka’s appearances focused on building her skills as a junior competitor. Known for her speed and energetic style, she engaged in matches that showcased her agility and developing grappling abilities, positioning herself as a promising lower mid card talent.

      Rydeen Hagane  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strong style elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Powerbomb, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Rydeen Hagane brought her strength and power based wrestling to Sendai Girls. Known for her physical dominance, she participated in matches that emphasized her ability to overpower opponents, blending power moves with strong style, making her a solid mid card presence.

      Ryo Mizunami  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2017, 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, versatile and charismatic
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of power moves and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Spear, Guillotine Leg Drop
    Brief Description:   Ryo Mizunami’s appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her charismatic and dynamic in ring style. Known for her strength and versatility, she engaged in intense matches that highlighted her ability to blend strong style with charisma, establishing herself as a key figure in the upper mid card.

      Sachiko Kanari  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with a mix of grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Sachiko Kanari focused on honing her traditional wrestling skills during her time in Sendai Girls. Known for her straightforward grappling and striking, she participated in matches that allowed her to build her in ring capabilities, establishing her as a steady lower mid card competitor.

      Saki Akai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, striking specialist
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, grappling, and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   High Kick, Spinning Backfist, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Saki Akai’s guest appearance brought her striking heavy style to Sendai Girls. Known for her elegant yet aggressive approach, she participated in matches that showcased her precision striking and ability to combine agility with technical grappling, making her a standout mid card performer.

      Sakura Hirota  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Comedic Roll Up, Sleeper Hold, Running Elbow
    Brief Description:   Sakura Hirota’s appearances in Sendai Girls were characterized by her humorous and gimmick heavy style. Known for incorporating comedy into her matches, she engaged in lighthearted bouts that entertained the audience, providing a contrast to the more serious competitors in the lower mid card.

      Samantha Heights  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snapmare, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Samantha Heights brought her energetic and agile style to Sendai Girls as an international guest. Known for her speed and technical abilities, she participated in matches that highlighted her dynamic in ring presence, making her a noteworthy mid card talent.

      Sammii Jayne  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Crossface, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Sammii Jayne’s guest appearance showcased her technical prowess and solid grappling skills. Known for her ability to blend striking with submissions, she delivered matches that emphasized her control and technique, establishing herself as a skilled mid card competitor.

      Sandra Moone  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Heel Kick, Dropkick, Springboard Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Sandra Moone brought her quick, agile style to her guest appearance in Sendai Girls. Known for her energy and ability to execute fast paced moves, she participated in matches that highlighted her dynamic offense, establishing herself as a promising junior competitor in the lower mid card.

      Santana Garrett  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Handspring Back Elbow, Muta Lock, Superkick
    Brief Description:   Santana Garrett's guest appearance showcased her agility and high flying capabilities. Known for her smooth technical skills and aerial maneuvers, she engaged in matches that emphasized her versatility and athleticism, making her a notable presence in the mid card.

      Saori Anou  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2020 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, versatile technician
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Diving Crossbody, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Saori Anou's appearances highlighted her well rounded technical abilities and speed. Known for her versatility, she delivered competitive matches that combined smooth grappling with precise striking, solidifying her role as a reliable mid card competitor in Sendai Girls.

      Sareee  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising star
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Dropkick, Uranage
    Brief Description:   Sareee's appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her hard hitting, strong style approach. Known for her crisp, impactful strikes and suplexes, she engaged in matches that emphasized her physicality and technical prowess, making her a standout talent in the mid card.

      Sawako Shimono  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Sawako Shimono focused on building her fundamental wrestling skills during her time in Sendai Girls. Known for her straightforward grappling and striking, she participated in matches that helped her refine her in ring abilities as a lower mid card competitor.

      Sayuri Okino  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Crossbody, Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Sayuri Okino is a developing junior competitor known for her speed and agility. Her matches feature quick, fluid movements and basic technical grappling, positioning her as a promising lower mid card talent who continues to grow in Sendai Girls.

      Sean Guinness  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Neckbreaker, Crossface, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Sean Guinness brought his well rounded hybrid style to Sendai Girls as an international guest. Known for his solid striking and technical prowess, he engaged in competitive matches that showcased his versatility, establishing him as a solid mid card performer during his stint.

      Seigo Tachibana  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, traditional grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and basic strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Seigo Tachibana's appearance was focused on traditional wrestling techniques. Known for his straightforward grappling, he participated in matches that emphasized basic moves and solid fundamentals, providing a steady presence in the lower mid card.

      Sendai Sachiko  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2006 2016
    Position on the Card:   Main event, tag team specialist
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with speed and precision
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Foot Stomp, Missile Dropkick, Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Sendai Sachiko was a core part of the tag team division, known for her high flying and dynamic style. As part of the Jumonji Sisters with Dash Chisako, she helped establish the promotion’s tag team scene with her agility and coordination, participating in thrilling main event bouts that showcased her speed and technical acumen.

      Shigeno Shima  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Springboard Crossbody, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   Shigeno Shima's guest appearance focused on his quick, agile wrestling style. Known for his speed and fluid movements, he engaged in matches that allowed him to demonstrate his athleticism and emerging skills as a lower mid card junior competitor.

      Shin Sakura Hirota  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic wrestler
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic and traditional elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Comedic Roll Up, Sleeper Hold, Hip Toss
    Brief Description:   Shin Sakura Hirota brought a humorous twist to her appearances, using a playful and comedic style. Known for incorporating comedy into her matches, she engaged in lighthearted bouts that entertained the audience, offering a contrast to the more serious competitors in the lower mid card.

      Shinjiro Otani  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with technical grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dragon Suplex, Facewash Kick, Springboard Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Shinjiro Otani's guest appearance brought his renowned technical skills to Sendai Girls. Known for his precise grappling and strong style strikes, he engaged in matches that emphasized his ability to control the pace and execute smooth, impactful moves, establishing his presence as a veteran in the mid card.

      Shinobu Kandori  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2010 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, legendary grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Shoot style, with a mix of grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Cross Armbreaker, Rear Naked Choke, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Shinobu Kandori's appearances were defined by her shoot style wrestling, focusing on grappling and submissions. Known for her background in martial arts, she delivered intense, competitive matches that showcased her technical mastery and toughness, making her a significant presence in the upper mid card.

      Shizuku Tsukata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Shizuku Tsukata is an emerging talent known for her speed and agility. Her matches in Sendai Girls feature quick, fluid movements and technical grappling, allowing her to build her skills and gain experience as a promising lower mid card competitor.

      Shunma Katsumata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with striking and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Running Bulldog, Diving Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Shunma Katsumata's guest appearance was marked by his speed and energetic in ring style. Known for his agility, he participated in matches that emphasized his ability to execute dynamic, high impact moves, making him a lively addition to the lower mid card.

      Shuri Okuda  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical striker
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, Crossface, Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Shuri Okuda's appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her hybrid style, blending striking with solid technical grappling. Known for her precise strikes and submissions, she delivered competitive matches that highlighted her skill and versatility, establishing her as a solid mid card competitor.

      Shuu Shibutani  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 2015 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, agile and technical competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a mix of speed and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Running Dropkick, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Shuu Shibutani brought her agility and technical prowess to her appearances. Known for her smooth transitions and quick movements, she participated in matches that showcased her ability to combine technical grappling with speed, making her a standout in the mid card.

      Solo Darling  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with striking and technical elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossbody, Dropkick, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Solo Darling’s guest appearance in Sendai Girls was defined by her quick, agile style. Known for her energetic moves and technical abilities, she engaged in matches that highlighted her ability to blend speed with grappling, establishing her as a charismatic lower mid card performer.

      Sonoko Kato  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 2013 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, versatile veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of technical and striking moves
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Running Knee Strike, Lariat
    Brief Description:   Sonoko Kato’s appearances brought her seasoned, strong style wrestling to Sendai Girls. Known for her versatility and veteran experience, she delivered hard hitting matches that combined technical skill with striking, making her a respected figure in the upper mid card.

      Soy  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic act
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic and traditional wrestling elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhand Chop, Comedic Roll Up, Running Clothesline
    Brief Description:   Soy’s appearance was characterized by his playful, gimmick heavy style. Known for incorporating humor into his matches, he entertained the audience with lighthearted antics and exaggerated moves, providing comic relief in the lower mid card.

      Spike Nishimura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and basic strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Running Bulldog
    Brief Description:   Spike Nishimura focused on building his traditional wrestling skills during his time in Sendai Girls. Known for his straightforward grappling and striking, he participated in matches that allowed him to refine his in ring abilities, establishing himself as a reliable lower mid card competitor.

      Starlight Kid  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and acrobatics
    Three Signature Moves:   Moonsault, Tornado DDT, Springboard Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Starlight Kid's appearances in Sendai Girls showcased her agility and high flying style. Known for her quick, acrobatic moves, she engaged in exciting, fast paced matches that highlighted her ability to execute aerial maneuvers with precision, making her a dynamic mid card performer.

      Stephanie Vaquer  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Lucha style, with speed and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Dropkick, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Stephanie Vaquer brought her lucha libre style to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that showcased her agility and technical skill. Known for her quick, high flying maneuvers, she provided an exciting, international flavor to the mid card during her guest appearance.

      Strong Style Rush  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present (Faction)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, aggressive faction
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power based moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Lariat, Tandem Suplex, Team assisted Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   Strong Style Rush is a faction known for their aggressive, hard hitting approach. Operating as a cohesive unit, they engage in matches that involve powerful team maneuvers and striking tactics, making them a formidable and intense presence in the mid card.

      Suzu Suzuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2021 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, rising technical striker
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of striking, agility, and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Running Dropkick, Rolling Elbow
    Brief Description:   Suzu Suzuki’s appearances in Sendai Girls highlighted her blend of technical skill and agility. Known for her crisp strikes and grappling ability, she participated in matches that showcased her versatility and precision, making her a rising talent in the mid card.

      Syuri  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical and striking specialist
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on kicks and submissions
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, Sleeper Hold, Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Syuri’s guest appearances were marked by her precise, hard hitting style. Known for her sharp kicks and technical grappling, she delivered intense matches that highlighted her ability to combine striking with smooth transitions, making her a formidable presence in the upper mid card.

      Tae Honma  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a mix of grappling and submissions
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, Snap Suplex, Running Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Tae Honma’s appearances focused on her technical grappling skills. Known for her solid submission holds and precise execution, she engaged in matches that emphasized her ability to control the pace, establishing herself as a reliable lower mid card competitor.

      Takako Inoue  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2010 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran technician
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with striking and submission elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Flying Knee Drop, Bridging German Suplex, Crossface
    Brief Description:   Takako Inoue’s appearances brought her veteran experience and technical prowess to Sendai Girls. Known for her precise strikes and smooth grappling, she participated in matches that showcased her skill and adaptability, making her a respected figure in the upper mid card.

      Takashi Sasaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, hardcore veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Hardcore, with a mix of brawling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Chair assisted Suplex, Running Lariat, Death Valley Driver
    Brief Description:   Takashi Sasaki’s guest appearance brought a hardcore edge to Sendai Girls. Known for his willingness to engage in brutal, physical matches, he participated in bouts that emphasized brawling and weapon use, adding intensity to the mid card during his stint.

      Takumi Iroha  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, strong style powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of power moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Knee Strike, German Suplex, Lariat
    Brief Description:   Takumi Iroha’s appearances were defined by her strong, powerful style. Known for her hard hitting strikes and suplexes, she engaged in matches that highlighted her ability to dominate opponents with physicality, making her a key competitor in the upper mid card.

      Takuya Sugawara  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, technical striker
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap DDT, Running Knee Strike, Crossface
    Brief Description:   Takuya Sugawara’s appearance was marked by his hybrid style, blending precise striking with technical grappling. Known for his smooth transitions and ability to deliver crisp moves, he participated in matches that allowed him to showcase his versatility, establishing himself as a capable lower mid card competitor.

      Tank Nagai  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on power moves and brawling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Spinebuster, Running Powerslam
    Brief Description:   Tank Nagai’s appearance brought his powerful, brawling style to the forefront in Sendai Girls. Known for his strength and ability to overpower opponents, he engaged in matches that highlighted his physical dominance, making him a solid mid card competitor during his guest stint.

      Tatsuhito Takaiwa  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical and striking veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a blend of strikes and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Powerbomb, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Tatsuhito Takaiwa's guest appearance was characterized by his precise, hard hitting style. Known for his technical skills and powerful strikes, he delivered matches that emphasized his experience and ability to blend grappling with strong style, establishing him as a reliable mid card presence.

      Team DIANA  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, competitive tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional tag, with teamwork and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Tandem Dropkick, Assisted Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   Team DIANA brought their cohesive tag team style to Sendai Girls. Known for their solid teamwork and technical skills, they participated in matches that highlighted their ability to work together effectively, delivering competitive tag team bouts in the mid card.

      Team Freelance  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, versatile and unpredictable
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of brawling, grappling, and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Lariat, Crossbody from the Top Rope, Tandem Back Suplex
    Brief Description:   Team Freelance added variety and unpredictability to the Sendai Girls' tag team division. Known for their adaptability and diverse skill sets, they engaged in matches that often involved a mix of styles, making them an interesting and versatile presence in the mid card.

      Team Ice Ribbon  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, traditional tag team competitors
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional tag, with a focus on teamwork and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Tandem Dropkick, Double German Suplex, Assisted Moonsault
    Brief Description:   Team Ice Ribbon brought their traditional tag team wrestling to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that showcased their solid teamwork and technical prowess. Known for their coordination and smooth execution, they delivered competitive performances that emphasized classic tag team elements.

      Team JWP  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, established tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with strong style and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Lariat, Tandem Suplex, Assisted Diving Elbow
    Brief Description:   Team JWP was known for their strong style and technical abilities, bringing a mix of power and precision to the tag team division. Their matches in Sendai Girls emphasized hard hitting moves and seamless teamwork, establishing them as an upper mid card force during their appearances.

      Team kg  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2021 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, dynamic junior tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Dropkick, Tandem Hurricanrana, Springboard Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Team kg brought energy and agility to their matches in Sendai Girls. Known for their speed and high flying abilities, they engaged in fast paced, dynamic bouts that emphasized quick movements and coordinated teamwork, making them a vibrant presence in the mid card.

      Team Marvelous  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2020 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, versatile and skilled
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of power, speed, and technical skills
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Tandem Dropkick, Assisted Moonsault
    Brief Description:   Team Marvelous showcased their versatility and cohesion in Sendai Girls. Known for their ability to blend different styles, they participated in matches that featured a mix of technical grappling, speed, and power, making them a dynamic and adaptable team in the mid card.

      Team REINA  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2016 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, strong and technical
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on power and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Powerbomb, Suplex Combination, Assisted Lariat
    Brief Description:   Team REINA brought a blend of strength and technical expertise to their tag matches. Known for their hard hitting style and precise execution, they engaged in matches that emphasized their power and solid teamwork, establishing themselves as a formidable mid card tag team.

      Team Sendai Girls  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2006 Present
    Position on the Card:   Main event, core tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of strong style, speed, and technical skills
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Foot Stomp, Tandem Suplex, Assisted Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Team Sendai Girls represents the core of the promotion's tag team division. Known for their consistent performance and cohesive teamwork, they blend strong style, speed, and technical prowess, delivering thrilling matches that showcase their versatility and resilience, solidifying their place as a main event staple in the promotion.

      Team Stardom  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, high profile team
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of speed, agility, and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Dropkick, Assisted Moonsault, Tandem Suplex
    Brief Description:   Team Stardom brought a polished, fast paced style to their matches in Sendai Girls. Known for their agility and technical skills, they engaged in high energy bouts that emphasized coordinated teamwork and dynamic offense, making them a prominent upper mid card force during their appearances.

      Team WAVE  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, versatile and cohesive team
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of technical grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Running Crossbody, Assisted DDT
    Brief Description:   Team WAVE's appearances were marked by their versatile approach, blending technical grappling with effective teamwork. Known for their smooth transitions and ability to adapt, they participated in matches that showcased their cohesive style, making them a reliable mid card tag team.

      Thunder Rock  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, dynamic and skilled
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with speed, technical skills, and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Assisted Moonsault, Tandem Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Thunder Rock, known for their speed and technical prowess, brought their cohesive teamwork to Sendai Girls. Consisting of fast paced action and high impact moves, their matches emphasized their ability to work seamlessly together, making them a notable and dynamic presence in the upper mid card.

      Tojyuki Leon  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a focus on grappling and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Crossface, Running Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Tojyuki Leon brought her technical wrestling skills to her appearances in Sendai Girls. Known for her precision and ability to control the pace of matches, she participated in bouts that highlighted her grappling and smooth transitions, establishing herself as a skilled mid card competitor.

      Tomoka Inaba  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Dropkick, Springboard Crossbody, Snapmare
    Brief Description:   Tomoka Inaba's appearance focused on her quick, agile style. As a junior competitor, she engaged in matches that showcased her speed and ability to execute dynamic moves, positioning herself as a promising lower mid card talent.

      Tomoka Nakagawa  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2012 2014 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, versatile and technical
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with technical skills, striking, and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   German Suplex, Running Knee Strike, Diving Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Tomoka Nakagawa’s appearances were characterized by her versatility and technical ability. Known for her adaptability in the ring, she participated in matches that showcased her precise grappling and striking, making her a formidable presence in the upper mid card.

      Toni Storm  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with power, speed, and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Strong Zero (Piledriver), Running Dropkick, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Toni Storm’s guest appearances brought her international flair and hybrid style to Sendai Girls. Known for her strength, speed, and technical finesse, she delivered matches that highlighted her ability to adapt and compete at a high level, making her a standout mid card competitor.

      Toshie Uematsu  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2009 2011 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with a blend of grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging Suplex, Running Dropkick, Diving Headbutt
    Brief Description:   Toshie Uematsu’s appearances were marked by her technical skills and veteran experience. Known for her precision and ability to blend grappling with striking, she participated in matches that emphasized her smooth execution and adaptability, solidifying her role as a respected upper mid card competitor.

      Tsubasa Kuragaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Powerbomb, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Tsubasa Kuragaki’s guest appearances were defined by her strength and power based style. Known for her ability to dominate matches with powerful grappling and hard hitting moves, she delivered performances that showcased her physicality, making her a solid and imposing presence in the mid card. 

      Tsukasa Fujimoto  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2012 2014 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, agile and technical
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a focus on speed, agility, and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Dropkick, Double Foot Stomp
    Brief Description:   Tsukasa Fujimoto’s appearances highlighted her speed and technical grappling skills. Known for her quick, fluid style and ability to execute precise moves, she engaged in matches that emphasized her agility and technical acumen, making her a dynamic and well rounded mid card competitor.

      Tsukushi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, junior high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Crossbody, Springboard Dropkick, Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Tsukushi's guest appearances were characterized by her agility and high flying abilities. Known for her quick, dynamic movements, she engaged in matches that showcased her ability to execute fluid and precise maneuvers, making her a standout junior competitor in the mid card.

      Tyrannosaurus Okuda  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, comedic character
    Wrestling Style:   Gimmick based, with comedic and traditional elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Overhand Chop, Comedic Roll Up, Shoulder Tackle
    Brief Description:   Tyrannosaurus Okuda’s appearance was marked by a playful, gimmick heavy style. Known for incorporating humor into his matches, he provided lighthearted entertainment through comedic antics and exaggerated moves, adding a fun contrast to the lower mid card.

      Unagi Sayaka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, speed, and agility
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Crossbody, Dropkick, DDT
    Brief Description:   Unagi Sayaka's guest stint showcased her energy and developing skills. Known for her speed and striking ability, she participated in matches that allowed her to blend agility with technical maneuvers, positioning her as a promising emerging talent in the lower mid card.

      Valkyrie  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present (Guest appearances as a team)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, cohesive tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with speed, power, and teamwork
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Dropkick, Tandem Suplex, Assisted Moonsault
    Brief Description:   Valkyrie is a tag team known for their seamless teamwork and versatile style. Their matches in Sendai Girls feature coordinated maneuvers that blend speed and power, showcasing their ability to work together effectively and making them a solid presence in the mid card tag team division.

      VENY  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, striking and agile competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with agility and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Heel Kick, Crossbody, Bridging Suplex
    Brief Description:   VENY brought a blend of strong style and agility to Sendai Girls. Known for her striking prowess and ability to execute quick, precise moves, she participated in matches that showcased her dynamic offense, establishing herself as a noteworthy mid card talent.

      Viper  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with strong style elements
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Powerslam, Splash, Lariat
    Brief Description:   Viper’s appearances in Sendai Girls were defined by her strength and imposing presence. Known for her ability to dominate opponents with powerful moves, she engaged in matches that emphasized her physicality and control, making her a formidable upper mid card competitor.

      Xandra Bale  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, international high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and speed
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Crossbody, Moonsault, Springboard Arm Drag
    Brief Description:   Xandra Bale’s guest appearance showcased her agility and aerial skills. Known for her dynamic, high flying style, she participated in matches that emphasized her ability to execute quick, fluid maneuvers, adding excitement to the lower mid card.

      Yako Fujigasaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2017
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing junior talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Snapmare
    Brief Description:   Yako Fujigasaki focused on building her skills as a junior competitor in Sendai Girls. Known for her speed and agility, she engaged in matches that allowed her to develop her grappling techniques and establish herself as a promising lower mid card talent.

      Yoko Bito  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2014 2015 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, strong style striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on kicks and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Roundhouse Kick, Lariat, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Yoko Bito’s appearances were marked by her strong style, focusing on powerful strikes and kicks. Known for her hard hitting moves, she participated in matches that showcased her ability to control and dominate her opponents, making her a solid mid card competitor during her stint. 

      Yoko Morino  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Yoko Morino is developing her skills as a traditional grappler in Sendai Girls. Her matches feature fundamental grappling and strikes, allowing her to build a foundation and grow as a competitor in the lower mid card.

      Yoko Yamada  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, technical junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Crossbody, Running Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Yoko Yamada’s guest appearance showcased her technical grappling skills. Known for her precision and control, she participated in matches that allowed her to display her smooth execution, establishing herself as a solid lower mid card competitor.

      Yoshikazu Yokoyama  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of strikes and submissions
    Three Signature Moves:   Dragon Suplex, Lariat, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Yoshikazu Yokoyama’s appearance brought a strong technical presence to the mid card. Known for his grappling skills and precise striking, he engaged in matches that highlighted his ability to dominate through technique and control.

      Yoshiko  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse and striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with powerful strikes and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Running Senton, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Yoshiko's appearances in Sendai Girls were characterized by her strength and hard hitting style. Known for her powerful strikes and resilience, she participated in matches that emphasized her ability to overpower opponents, establishing herself as a formidable figure in the upper mid card.

      Yoshiko Tamura  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2010 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with strong style elements and submissions
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, German Suplex, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   Yoshiko Tamura’s guest appearance was marked by her technical proficiency and veteran experience. Known for her smooth transitions and effective submissions, she delivered matches that showcased her expertise, making her a respected presence in the upper mid card.

      Yua Hayashi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Arm Drag, Snapmare
    Brief Description:   Yua Hayashi is focused on developing her traditional wrestling skills in Sendai Girls. Her matches feature fundamental grappling and basic strikes, allowing her to build experience and grow as a promising competitor in the lower mid card.

      Yuhi  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2013 2014 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, agile and technical
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with speed, agility, and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Bridging German Suplex, Springboard Dropkick, Diving Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Yuhi’s guest appearances were defined by her agility and technical finesse. Known for her quick, smooth movements, she engaged in matches that highlighted her ability to combine speed with precise grappling, making her a dynamic presence in the mid card.

      Yukari Hosokawa  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2021
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Yukari Hosokawa is an emerging junior talent known for her speed and agility. Her matches often feature quick, fluid movements that allow her to showcase her dynamic in ring style, positioning her as a promising competitor in the lower mid card.

      Yukari Ishino  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 2020
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with basic grappling and strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   Yukari Ishino focused on developing her fundamental wrestling skills during her time in Sendai Girls. Known for her straightforward grappling, she participated in matches that allowed her to build her experience and establish herself as a steady presence in the lower mid card.

      Yuki Ino  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, technical and agile
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with striking, speed, and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Crossbody, Bridging German Suplex, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Yuki Ino’s appearance brought a well rounded, hybrid style to the mid card. Known for his agility and technical skills, he engaged in matches that showcased his ability to blend speed with effective grappling, making him a versatile competitor during his guest stint.

      Yuki Miyazaki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, veteran high flyer
    Wrestling Style:   High flying, with agility and speed
    Three Signature Moves:   Diving Elbow Drop, Moonsault, Bridging Suplex
    Brief Description:   Yuki Miyazaki’s guest appearances were defined by her high flying and energetic style. Known for her agility and ability to execute aerial maneuvers, she participated in matches that highlighted her dynamic offense, establishing her as a reliable and exciting mid card competitor.

      Yumi Ohka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2016 2017 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, strong style veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with power moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Running Knee Strike, German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Yumi Ohka’s appearances brought her strong, powerful style to Sendai Girls. Known for her hard hitting moves and veteran presence, she delivered matches that showcased her ability to dominate with strength and precision, making her a formidable upper mid card competitor.

      Yumiko Hotta  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2008 2010 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, veteran striker
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Spinning Backfist, Roundhouse Kick, Bridging Suplex
    Brief Description:   Yumiko Hotta's appearances were marked by her hard hitting, strong style approach. Known for her powerful strikes and grappling expertise, she engaged in intense matches that emphasized her physicality and veteran presence, making her a respected upper mid card competitor.

      YUNA  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and strikes
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
    Brief Description:   YUNA is focused on developing her traditional wrestling skills. Her matches often feature basic grappling and striking, allowing her to build her in ring experience and establish herself as a promising lower mid card competitor in Sendai Girls.

      Yuna Mizumori  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, energetic and charismatic
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with speed, agility, and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Splash, Crossbody, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Yuna Mizumori brought her lively and energetic style to Sendai Girls. Known for her charisma and dynamic in ring presence, she engaged in matches that showcased her ability to blend power and agility, making her a vibrant lower mid card talent during her guest appearance.

      Yura Suzuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Dropkick, Arm Drag, Running Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Yura Suzuki is an emerging talent known for her speed and agility. Her matches in Sendai Girls often feature quick, fluid movements that allow her to showcase her dynamic style, positioning her as a promising lower mid card competitor.

      Yurie Kaneko  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2020 2022
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, developing grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Traditional, with grappling and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Snap Suplex, Dropkick, Armbar
    Brief Description:   Yurie Kaneko focused on building her fundamental wrestling skills during her time in Sendai Girls. Known for her straightforward grappling and solid strikes, she participated in matches that allowed her to refine her abilities, making her a steady lower mid card presence.

      Yurika Oka  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, junior competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and technical grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Springboard Crossbody, Snap Suplex, Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Yurika Oka is a junior competitor known for her quick, agile style. Her matches often feature fast paced action, allowing her to showcase her speed and technical skills, establishing her as a promising talent in the lower mid card of Sendai Girls.

      Yusaku Obata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2019 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, technical grappler
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with a mix of striking and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Neckbreaker, German Suplex, Crossface
    Brief Description:   Yusaku Obata's appearance was marked by his technical grappling and striking abilities. Known for his smooth transitions and control, he participated in matches that allowed him to showcase his versatility, making him a solid lower mid card competitor.

      Yutaka Yoshie  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, powerhouse veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Power based, with brawling and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Splash, Lariat, Powerbomb
    Brief Description:   Yutaka Yoshie’s appearance brought a powerful, imposing style to Sendai Girls. Known for his strength and physical dominance, he engaged in matches that emphasized his ability to control and overpower opponents, making him a formidable upper mid card presence during his stint.

      Yuu  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, powerhouse
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a focus on power moves and striking
    Three Signature Moves:   Running Powerslam, Lariat, Bridging German Suplex
    Brief Description:   Yuu's appearances in Sendai Girls were characterized by her strength and powerful in ring style. Known for her ability to dominate matches with powerful strikes and suplexes, she engaged in bouts that showcased her resilience and control, making her a key competitor in the mid card.

      Yuu Yamagata  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2017 2018 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Upper mid card, technical veteran
    Wrestling Style:   Technical, with grappling and submission moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Crossface, Bridging German Suplex, Running Dropkick
    Brief Description:   Yuu Yamagata brought her technical expertise to her appearances in Sendai Girls. Known for her smooth grappling and precision, she participated in matches that emphasized her ability to control the pace with technical maneuvers, establishing her as a respected upper mid card competitor.

      Yuzuki  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 (Guest appearance)
    Position on the Card:   Lower mid card, emerging talent
    Wrestling Style:   Speed based, with agility and basic grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Dropkick, Springboard Crossbody, Snap Suplex
    Brief Description:   Yuzuki is a developing competitor known for her quick, agile style. Her matches in Sendai Girls feature fast paced sequences and basic technical moves, allowing her to showcase her speed and potential as a promising lower mid card talent.

      ZAP  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2015 2016 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, striking and power based
    Wrestling Style:   Strong style, with a mix of strikes and grappling
    Three Signature Moves:   Lariat, Powerbomb, Running Knee Strike
    Brief Description:   ZAP’s appearances were marked by her strong style and aggressive approach. Known for her powerful strikes and ability to control matches, she delivered performances that emphasized her physicality, making her a solid presence in the mid card.

      Zeuxis  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2018 2019 (Guest appearances)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, international lucha competitor
    Wrestling Style:   Lucha libre, with agility, speed, and technical moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Hurricanrana, Moonsault, Diving Crossbody
    Brief Description:   Zeuxis brought her lucha libre style to Sendai Girls, engaging in matches that showcased her agility and high flying maneuvers. Known for her speed and smooth transitions, she participated in dynamic, fast paced bouts that highlighted her international flair, making her a notable mid card guest.

      ZONES  
    Time in Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling (Sendai Girls):   2021 Present (Faction)
    Position on the Card:   Mid card, cohesive tag team
    Wrestling Style:   Hybrid, with teamwork, speed, and power moves
    Three Signature Moves:   Double Suplex, Tandem Dropkick, Assisted Moonsault
    Brief Description:   ZONES is a faction known for their solid teamwork and hybrid style. Their matches in Sendai Girls feature coordinated maneuvers that blend speed and power, showcasing their ability to work together effectively. They have established themselves as a reliable and cohesive mid card tag team, consistently delivering competitive performances.

